I am scared that when I can’t spoil you any more the way you are use to you won’t want me any more. So instead of my waiting I thought it best to tell you to find someone else in hopes that it would not hurt when you told me that you found someone who can spoil you.
Fourth, the class lasted for an hour and the members were attentive and responsive all during that time. Almost everyone will tell you that a class that lasts this long is not wise within our community. However, even after the class was dismissed, the members did not want to leave. They continued to linger for another half hour.
After all, what they had done was, technically, “criminal sexual contact” with intent to humiliate or degrade. And so sex offenders he ruled they were. That meant they were subject to Megan’s Law. In New Jersey, such offenders, even as young as 13, have to register for life.
I am the only one still awake in the house. It is totally quiet except for the sound machine doing its thing in the nursery. And the dishwasher buzzer went off.
That is the number 1 donor to the Democratic party - thieves (don't worry - they are bipartisan and donate to Republicans also. Just to hedge their bets...).
When applying this model to the children out wreaking havoc on our streets – what needs are being met by the actions they are taking?
The first card was made for the Kraft Journal challenge. The challenge was Anything Goes. I happened to be at my LSS and found a few neat stamps. These were some of the Penny Black stamps I picked up. I always think of Penny Black stamps being cute and cuddly - kittens and hedgehogs and such. This is certainly not in that line.
This painting was 12x12, and it was a joy to create! It is modern and graphic, yet vintage and old-looking. Perfect combination! And the concept is completely original. I personally have never seen anything like it.
We lived there four years. We finally moved out when they needed to come in AGAIN and do more tearing down to fix the stuff they didn't fix the first time.
The hydrangea is from Prima Marketing. The roses and the cherryblossom are from Wild Orchid Crafts. The cute little button is from Papermania.
Meanwhile, Kalinda was forced into crisis mode after a clueless Alicia called Kalinda’s dangerous (and, I assume, violent) husband, prompting Kalinda to get ready to run.
Epilogue
This challenge will remain at the top with inspiration from all our Design Team - but be sure to visit their own blogs for many more fabulous creations and lots of squigglieness!!
The kicker was that this conversation was led by a woman who was going through her third divorce. How does one fail at marriage three times by the age 45? It seemed that I was the only one who thought that was odd. All present congratulated her for knowing how to get a man... even if she couldn't keep one. And collectively, they couldn't accept that I had chosen to be happily single.
Long and I debated whether or not we should fight our way into one of the last two boats. We could almost see the ship slowly going down by the head. There was so much confusion, we did not think they would reach the water right side up and decided not to attempt it. I do not know what I thought could happen, but we had not given up hope.
Two media organisations in particular enjoy scaring their audience with exaggerated levels of gloom. The Daily Mail and the BBC. Draw your own conclusions about that unholy alliance.
My day so far in a nutshell. Now I gotta go clean up/organize our garage (aka my workshop/storage room) to make room for the new pieces before hubby gets home and is completely overwhelmed by my mess out there! Nothing gets my blood flowing like a good day of treasure hunting:)
The destructive policies of the Frankfurt school were known collectively as Cultural Terrorism. Today, they are simply referred to as Political Correctness, an ideology people are aware of, although very few know of its anti-Western, destructive and revolutionary roots. Doubters should ask why the victims of the politically correct lobby are overwhelmingly white, Christian, capitalist, heterosexual and male, or DWEMs as they are crudely referred to in America, short for Dead White European Males.
What green kryptonite was to Superman, love is to me.
And Scott and I breathe a sigh of relief that the kid isn't going to choke on it in his sleep when it just drops out, without toilet paper.
o Optimism / Positivity – Extensive research is demonstrating the power of a positive attitude, such as believing a conflict can be solved. It provides resourcefulness, reduces stress and supports creative thought in finding solutions. Thought leaders include Martin Seligman (2002, 2011) and Barbara Fredrickson (2009).
I use YOSHIDA STYLE Ball Jointed Doll Making Guide to start this project. I had difficulty looking for it here in our country, I'm just super lucky that I have a friend in Japan who sell japanese stuff on facebook. She find one for me, although it's expensive, I didn't think twice to get it.
Debra!
FIRST HALF SONG CRITIQUE - RULES & WHAT TO BRING: 1 song either on tape, CD or live (bring own guitar or keyboard) and 20 copies of your typed lyric sheet with contact details clearly displayed. Read the RULES at www.songsalive.org go PROGRAMS / WORKSHOPS
Fill us with you love
BITTERSWEET MEMORIES OF “A SEPARATION”
What makes this sitcom so appealing is the cast. The actors and actresses in the show are all very talented. Of course, the fact that ‘Friends’ has many witty scriptwriters who give the cast wonderfully clever lines to say helps a lot!
Hot Choklat
Or Philippa as the case may be.
Apple has said nothing about an upcoming upgrade for iOS, but it regularly announces new editions at WWDC. It used last year’s conference to introduce iOS 5, which powered the iPhone 4S when it launched four months later.
10 box jumps
WE ARE SPECIAL! Until we all stop undercharging for our work, we are never going to earn what we are worth. How on earth do we fix this??
Cantor
Ferdinand Bardamu: Tally ho, chap. I say, what are you agitating about?
Let’s go further. “Waiting three months?” and “Three months after it happened? ” Rabbi, perhaps it is time to get your facts right before writing such a strong condemnation. In case you did not know, the extremists returned within the last few weeks! They returned with more people and with an organized bus! Our informants in RBS Bet told us that if there was not going to be some kind of strong response the extremists were going to escalate things until who knows what could have happened to a Jewish child, rachmana litzlan.
Do you know that God’s goodness and unfailing love were pursuing you this week?
Publisher: Pocket Books (April 24, 2012)
5.) You dream about moving to a packed subdivision
And sings the tune without the words,
On to the next 25!
Any other inquiries please email me at hello@claireleggett.co.uk
I rounded the wide corner that swallows Turk at Taylor and Market and noticed that he reeked of alcohol. Maybe he wasn't a bum, maybe just a drunk with bad hygiene.
The way I went about making the cake is slightly different from the original recipe. I took an extra step here and there just to make sure I get the folding of the flour and the oil right. If you are an experienced baker, do hop over to Wen's blog for the original recipe, if you are as gung ho as me, feel free to try out my version...which I am afraid, for the time being, comes with no guarantee of success ;)
The sun in shining - what is up with that?
Mugabe, we are told, instituted a Soviet style command economy. He nationalized large sectors of the economy and fixed prices. His actions killed off the little economic activity still taking place. As the economy contracted, he continued to promiscuously print money. The result: hyperinflation approaching 2000 percent and predicted by the International Monetary Fund to reach 4,278.8 percent this year. The infrastructure is collapsing. The smell of sewerage hanging over Harare is more than metaphoric—the treatment facilities, like the grid, are not maintained.
Loving each other,
I am seriously sad that I'm not pregnant right now and won't be pregnant this summer*. What the hell?
485510 Charter bus industry
Jim McCarty - drums
“You should tweet this,” he sniggered.
First the painting itself: The Way to Calvalry or it is also called The Procession to Cavalry. It’s kind of overwhelming in that so much is going on. But when you get inside of the groupings, and see the activities of these people, then the power of this art work grows exponentially.
Well, how about if we define "better" as "more valuable"?
“Junior hasn’t called me in two days. I want to send him one. To protect him.”
Knowing that Mr. W. often has produce which has been damaged/blemished/fallen into the dirt & all of it not up to "gift giving quality", I asked him this year if I could take some of the "spoils" as well.
existence the city offers them, and inspired by s vision of how full and
Self-perpetuating success.
“When we get home, can I play Wii?” he asked.
At Regen Projects this month, in anticipation of Welling’s upcoming inclusion in the Whitney Biennial, we see three bodies of his work. First, we have a series of drapes photographed by Welling many years ago and now saturated in monochromatic colors. There is a series of close-ups featuring barely recognizable netting performing the formal role of musculature in sculpture, and finally, there are Welling’s famous sun-stroked flowers, existing on the threshold of being visible. All of these projects could be called abstract photography, a method now gaining popularity through the works both Welling’s students and others around the world.
Since the beginning of the 21st century, Syria, both as people and institutions had faced the challenge of development and modernization during tough regional and international circumstances which targeted its national sovereignty. This has formed the incentive to accomplish this Constitution as the basis for strengthening the rule of law.
400g macaroni
SO, I know it has been a while since I was here. I had my birthday, and got LOADED up with stuff for card making, thanks mostly to my Dear Charlie (DC). I am up to my eyeballs in new stamps and paper and ink and tools! Woo to the Hoo!
“With that, he let the three of us out, lit up a fag, got in his car and went off to the golf course.”
The Fukushima Daiichi plant, 135 miles northeast of Tokyo, was crippled by meltdowns and explosions after the quake and tsunami, which killed more than 19,000 people。
A while ago I wrote a post about young drivers being charged a painful amount on their insurance and how I thought it was unfair. But if a much harder test has been introduced, shouldn't this mean that our younger drivers are getting a better education behind the wheel and have more knowledge of the Highway Code? In my opinion, I don't think anyone really learns how to drive until they've passed their test and are driving the car completely on their own, with no back-seat drivers, no instructors and no one reminding them to indicate, check their mirror, slow down etc. It isn't surprising that insurance companies are charging so much though, because if a new driver doesn't have the experience then surely they have more chance of causing an accident. On the other hand, if I were to take my test again I couldn't be sure I'd pass, and I reckon that goes for many others.
hanna montana sunglasses- those go with my um…jeans
Sing like bird, dizzy in my head
Al Pacino: "It's great working with John because he has a way of getting involved - in the whole thing, in the characters. He asks so many questions - he was just brilliant. It was tough to sell Johnny, but once Sidney got to see him read, and work with me, it turned out great."
It has come to my attention that my blog isn't proper.
The Nikon 24-70mm lens is a magnificent piece of kit. In the photography world where there is never much agreement on anything, most amateur and professional Nikon shooters agree that the 24-70mm is one of the finest pieces of equipment to ever come from Nikon.
Memories shattered,
Attributes: Agility-d6, Smarts-d6, Spirit-d12, Strength-d12+8, Vigor-d10
The truth is that there is no set recipe to what makes a wonderful and memorable wedding shower for a bride-to-be! If you are a bride that is also concerned about your impact on the environment, then you can choose from one of the many creative options above to plan a unique shower that is also environmentally conscious…
Bad tactics: Assuming that you can ram everything, trying to get it into tight areas or around blind corners.
A broad debate is taking place as political views evolve and regulatory postures soften towards the use of Schedule I drugs. Schedule I drugs are classified as having a high potential for abuse, present an unacceptable safety risk, and have no acceptable medical use. Drugs in this category typically include marijuana and psychedelics.
Another reason for the heavy weight given to official sources is that the mass media claim to be “objective” dispensers of the news. Partly to maintain the image of objectivity, but also to protect themselves from criticisms of bias and the threat of libel suits, they need material that can be portrayed as presumptively accurate. This is also partly a matter of cost: taking information from sources that may be presumed credible reduces investigative expense, whereas material from sources that are not prima facie credible, or that will elicit criticism and threats, requires careful checking and costly research.
Because my thought was not put inside.
Tavi is the third extremely close friend that has abandoned LA for international travels. Katherine moved to Sweden almost three years ago (holy crap, has it already been three years?), and last fall, Jen moved to Germany to go back to school. And now Tavi. I’d be lying if I said I wasn’t bummed, because I am. I miss Katherine and Jen like crazy, and I’ll miss Tavi, too. He’ll be back, in November, but that’s a long ways away.
gone and not much further on my trip.
let us remember there would be no Christmas without You, Lord,
Life can be extremely difficult and painful at times. We live in a fallen world. We experience problems, heartaches, disappointments, and loss. Where can you go for help? Go to Jesus. He will sustain you.
17 So if you consider me your partner, give him the same welcome you would give me if I were coming. 18If he has harmed you in any way or stolen anything from you, charge me for it. 19 I, Paul, write this in my own handwriting: “I will repay it.” And I won’t mention that you owe me your very soul!
that we should do it again in May!)
In Very High mode, the GTX 670 is the overall winner, coming in ~12% faster than the Radeon and 36.5% faster than the GTX 580. This trend collapsed when we increased to Ultra High settings — none of the video cards tested here were capable of maintaining a smooth frame rate under the load. The GTX 580 wins overall, but doesn’t really offer a playable frame rate.
Assalamualaikum and hello,
On the front of games suggested to play by my GS buddies, I completed Assassin’s Creed II as suggested by Gigastormz. The game was amazing and I gave it a 9.5 as well as obtaining the platinum trophy. Get caught up on my thoughts of ACII here.
and it's going to be here for yet a couple more.
And, third, the phrase "shall be presumed valid" doesn't seem to me at all to suggest clear and convincing evidence. A presumption normally doesn't have anything to do with clear and convincing evidence. Most presumptions can be disproved by much less than clear and convincing evidence. So how do you read that in your position into the language of the statute?
Buries
I get back in the car and we start off again. Guess what….. The bitch gets on her cell again. I turn the radio up. She gets the point and gets off the phone. The bitch makes a comment about seeing if we can catch an earlier flight. THIS IS THE SMARTEST THING TO EVER COME OUT OF HER MOUTH. Soon as we get close to Denver my buddy calls to check on available flights. Of course the automated system sucks and the operator is a moron. We find out that there are no available flights out. We arrive at Denver international at about 100 pm. As we are pulling in we are talking about what we were going to do. My suggestion is to check in, check our luggage and see about an earlier flight. We stop in a no parking zone so that we can unload our luggage. We get our luggage and we are talking about the plan. The bitch just walks off. I’m thinking what the fuck. Does she not want to be part of the decision? Does she just want to stay at the airport? The three of them check in all luggage and they all come back to the truck.
He looked at the bags, unsmiling.
Questions explored in this week’s Once Upon A Time, ‘The Return’: Mr. Gold’s true loyalties revealed? Mary Margaret cleared? August’s identity uncovered? Henry not being annoying??? Read on for the answers, and more!
To finish out the story, I think my friend could have hooked up with one of the Cougars, but I mentioned how I may be the only black man not voting for Obama and the conversation turned political. Too bad about that one. I didn't help that the cute one started getting all emotional with some random rant about how she won't talk with guy who have not had tragedies in his life. Probably not the way to attract a man. Waitress, Check Please!
The corners of his mouth drooped peevishly.
Our room - two deluxe queen beds and an alcove with bunk beds and a TV for the kids.
Wednesday: three cheese tortellini, salad
Are you done?
Happy Star Wars Day! May the Fourth be with you.
2. Reveal your five picks for the award and let them know.
Some of you will find the discussion of such things distasteful or even intolerant. If this is your position then you need to look at the implications. Muslims see Sharia Law as being the incontrovertible law of god. It is totally inflexible and their duty to impose it, and live by it, wherever they are able. If you find the mere discussion of the principles of Islam offensive then you have a problem.
Here’s a synopsis about the show:
We still had a lot of food in the ice-box left-over from yesterday’s
Fish for a few hours and eat a crumbled granola bar if you where awake enough to remember to bring one.
Drove around at 2:30am with a baby who could only sleep in the car, because it taught me how to be more selfless and how to sing songs that even a baby would enjoy.
I’ll admit that I really wanted to read Poems by Currer, Ellis, and Acton Bell (Charlotte, Emily, and Anne Bronte), but I couldn’t find a copy in my library system anywhere. Has anyone else read the first publication of the Bronte sisters? Searching through the system, I noticed a lot of different versions of Emily’s poems, but none by the other sisters. I chose to read The Complete Poems of Emily Jane Bronte edited from Manuscripts by C.W. Hatfield. After reading The Brontes: A Beginner’s Guide by Steve Eddy, I discovered that critically, Emily’s poems are the most beloved of the sisters’ as they are the most original. Thus the reason why I had troubles finding poems by Anne and Charlotte.
And I found sadness there. The phrases and words singled out like Phil Spector, Providence, or, what I think is the best work of the show, Faith hovering in the space are the elegant remnants of a society laid low by some sort of trauma, some sort of loss. Even in the fancy space of Regen Projects, these signs remind me of the signs of the homeless, put together with whatever they can found to say a few words, not to express those words for the sake of expression alone but to (sometimes) say that one is hungry. They could be lying, of course, but the poetry is in the discarded materials, a nub of wood or a shard of cardboard.
So, while I'm more of a cheese than chocolate girl, this is an interesting deviation from the standard cocktail fare for sophisticated sippers with a sweet tooth.
McCann M. The impact of hazards in art on female workers. Preventive Medicine 1978; 7: 338-348.
So. We begin.
There's a fine short opening story by the legendary Ray Bradbury, although I found myself enjoying the longer pieces, such as Jeffrey Thomas' 'A Semblance of Life,' and John Shirley's killer 'Raise Your hand if You're Dead' (there's also an interview with Shirley). It was also nice to see authors Bruce Taylor and Jeremy Robert Johnson leaving the bizarro world for a few minutes and delivering two solid tales (although each one strange in their own ways...especially Taylor's 'Metamorphosis Blues). Fans of Ronald Malfi will be pleased with 'Closing In,' and there's the winning entry from a Dark Discoveries short fiction contest by Blu Gilliand.
by Korifaeus
It’s light in God
1. Intro
But for now I think the 330ml format is in for serious growth in UK & choice can only be a good thing, right? Also with canned beers having now put a toe in the door in the craft brewing sector, what are your thoughts on your ideal serving size? Are you a sharer, a traditionalist or are you more comfortable with 330ml becoming more common?
If you don't have friends like that - get some. For real. You might need them when you least expect.
Line 2 cookie sheets with parchment papers. Set aside.
Artist Statement:
I like In the Line of Fire. As far as action movies go, it is right up there with the original Lethal Weapon in terms of intelligence and entertainment value. I highly recommend it. The only thing that keeps me from giving the movie a higher rating is the implausibility of the romance between Raines and Horrigan and the fact Horrigan is well passed mandatory retirement age for field agents in the Secret Service. The movie is good enough for that not ruin it for me.
I don't know if you can tell, we had a broken foot on the lower right gingerbread man. Watch out that you don't roll your MM to thin. The good news is, the MM glues together beautifully.
Also make sure the opening jives with the way you want your graphic. I forgot about checking that but got lucky and didn't have any upside down graphics.
Violent Femmes were an American alternative rock band from Milwaukee, Wisconsin, initially active between 1980 and 1987 and again from 1988 to 2009. The band performed as a trio, including: singer, guitarist and songwriter Gordon Gano, bassist Brian Ritchie, and two drummers, Victor DeLorenzo (1980–1993 and 2002–2009) and Guy Hoffman (1993–2002).
Also, this is going on:
1120 Pacific Ave
Highlights – Good fight, I thought it may go to a third round, but ended in a split decision. 8 second knockout man Sam, lost the decision. The guys sweating out Cruz’s locker was also amusing. The female MMA champ teaching Judo was nice, but more amusing was all the guys not knowing how to act with her whilst watching the pay per view.
Negative Results to be aware:
What’s the number one thing that you can do to help guard yourself against a cold and the flu? Wash your hands. Washing your hands before eating, during food preparation, after bathroom use, after touching surfaces in common areas and/or after blowing your nose or sneezing greatly reduces the amount of germs on your hands and prevents the spread of illness.
You will then earn $12.5/mo for each person that those people refer down to your 5th Referral Level. If you do the multiplication, you will see that you’re now earning an extra $49,000/mo.
Andre G. Fletcher, 37, North Babylon, N.Y.
Sounds unreal? Maybe it is or maybe these are next steps in using bicycles within commercial businesses. What about having a tricycle with carrier in the back or a folding bike pulling a shopping trailer while negotiating the kilometres of highways within those colossal shopping super stores?
13.) Poochie, Poochie-woochie
Contrast the famous “Kaaaannnn!!” with Kirk’s next reaction. Shatner is often blasted for being a ham actor--deservedly so--but he does not always get the credit he deserves when he does it right. Kirk sits dejected and pours his heart out to Carol in barely more than a whisper. All the things he has done in the last few hours have been wrong. He has lost hisship, killed a number of his crew, been beaten by an enemy he had long since forgotten, and now his estrangement with his son brought back to slap him in the face. He is too old to captain a starship. It isa very effective moment which makes the often heroic Kirk look small.
Yankovic
maybe it is a little girly but he is going to get it anyways..haha
The problem with Nigerian dwarves is they’re en vogue right now. I’m not the only one who thinks that a dog-sized goat is more manageable than a goat-sized goat. Young purebred does routinely cost $250 and up, and I’m not willing to spend that much before I know if I’m a goat person. Exit plans and minimizing investment are a good idea when trying out a new type of livestock.
Many of the memes are generated from websites that have a database of pictures users can customize with their own captions. While many of the memes on the page are generated by other students, Long and Barse add their own memes that address whatever the student body is talking about.
½ cup butter/margarine
So I just wanted to let you know, thank-you all and obviously ask you to still keep me in your thoughts(!) so that this may continue and I can start real recuperation now.
In my earlier discussion of the book, I listed young Colton (now twelve) as the main author, with his father, mother and Lynn Vincent as co-authors. Curiously, in the latest version of the book neither Colton nor his mother are listed as authors.
"There's a lot of humour in the music, but a lot of people home in on the disturbing side. It's got really disturbing on this tour. People have come to hate me. A guy in Oslo kept trying to assault me. I got a letter from another guy who basically blamed me for all his problems. He'd bought all the records, and he was basically accusing me of sending him over the edge."
Cure Love cats UK
Reasons Hermione reminds me of me:
At that point, the failure rate was 20%. However, the sample size was small: 5. Though we had problems in the past with the application releases, we didn’t have enough issues to be able to halt the deployment. I realized this, as did he, and that’s why he gave me instructions to proceed with another batch of installs. I turned and informed the Charlotte folks, who groaned. They had seen the problems before, too. So we bore down and hit another 5. Everything was okay. Then we did another 5. Another database lost. Still, we’re talking 2 out of 15, which wasn’t enough to stop the installation. The application was getting upgraded properly and there was a workaround, to tell the application to re-pull all the data from the server, basically re-establishing each local database. Another 5, and a couple more failures. Now we’re 4 for 20, and we’re maintaining at 20% failure rate.
I suggest you bring some tissues for this one just in case and I hope you will make the best of what this movie has to offer because “we are all disguised as ourselves”.
Great! You're almost completely down. Now snip the corners up to the stitching line - this will give you nice sharp edges and clip off any extra zipper tape.
Bookkeeping
Heh heh. Please forgive the self-effusiveness, but I just got word that Above Reproach is now live and available for sale and download on Amazon.com.
~ the roles or uses of magic in video games, on-line communities, role-playing games, subcultural formations and identities
And the apple seed.
them in some... pop song, y'know, and end up abusing their talents.
There is a very disagreeable feeling
I came to this movie with a very specific perspective – this might be an overshare, but I was raised by (somewhat) reformed hippies, and my father in particular had difficulty reconciling his idealistic and self-interested past with the duties of being a parent. I grew up in a house not entirely unlike Jack & Rose’s until I was nearly her age, and the degree of isolation that Rose deals with in Ballad reminds me of my own early adolescence, which has been both a blessing and a difficulty to me. In any case, between both my own family and those similar to us in the town where I grew up, I learned a lot at an early age about the vanity, selfishness, and gross snobbery that went hand-in-hand with certain aspects of hippie idealism.
Old school hand wraps are exactly that, wraps-similar to an ace bandage. They take some technique and a few minutes to put on, but they are pretty cheap.
He relates the story of St. Paul from 2 Corinthians 1 and the pain Paul suffered because of the accusations made against him. He feels betrayed by the church. Paul understood that Christ suffered and so shall we. Paul also writes about the comfort he received from God.
Guaranteed Enzyme Activity to Help Break Down Cellulose
Lindsay Crouse (Places in the Heart)
To find a nice beach in the Keys, just drive until you see one. Park your car and swim until you get tired. Then, get back in your car and look for another beach. There are two I’d like to recommend. Anne’s Beach is good, but there are very few parking spots. And there is a nameless beach on the southern side of the 7-mile bridge.
I’m beat… I am seriously so exhausted and because I work every third weekend, I hate sitting at home on the two weekends in a row I’m off. But I can’t even fathom putting makeup on after taking a shower right now. I came home and sat on my couch for a good ten minutes without moving at all.
1. We were asked what the best barbecue in town was. Someone said Oklahoma Joe’s. Get this – the instructor said NO. Pointed at the next person. NO. The next. NO. After about 6 of these, he said Danny Edwards. Hands down the best barbecue in town. I like Danny Edwards. It’s not the best barbecue in town. And don’t be an asshole and tell me I’m wrong.
Here are some cards to inspire you
Bradford Railway, 1846
Jaela - tells us to do chores
AW the Alchemist said that El Capitan was with him in the tunnel.
in the double womb of bin and boat
Fortunately, he is a kind and considerate man, so all was well.
To me those moments are what life is all about. When you find something that can provide you with such an experience that the moment you turn away you feel compelled to turn around and run back to it.
Bun Bo - October 14
For example, 200 means the tweet was sent successfully, and 403 means you have attempted a duplicate tweet. However you can omit the code-checking if you are not fussed about your tweet’s status.
Tammy took her to the examination room where she was left to the care of a seasoned nurse practitioner with greying curly hair and the tell-tale stethoscope. Her name was Nadine. She took out her computer tablet and asked Tori about her medical history. In the meanwhile, an ultrasound technician wheeled her machine into the room and started setting up next to the examination table. When Nadine determined that there were no contraindications for medical abortion, she told Tori to lie down on the table and push down her sweatpants bellow the belly. The technician then squeeze some gel onto her abdomen and then sat down and applied the transducer underneath her belly button. Nadine left the room and came back with a tray and set it on the armrest of the large armchair that was used for administering injections.
Flash forward to last Sautrday. Jenn is fighting with her inner self about what she should wear and I was dressed and ready to go. The baby was ready for grandma's and I was just glad that we were going out.
The cultivation of GE Bt brinjal is proposed in some countries across Asia, including India, where there is currently a moratorium on commercialisation, and the Philippines, where field trials are going on. “There are many concerns with GE brinjal, which has been engineered to be resistant to certain insect pests using Bt genes from the soil bacterium Bacillus thuringiensis. These concerns include food safety and possible effects on organisms other than the pest insect (non-target organisms), such as beneficial insects and butterflies.”
Section 24G(1) enacts that a court or the Tribunal may declare an unfair contract term under sections 24C and 24 D to be void and subsection (2) is not unlike Clause 24 of the UK Unfair Contract Terms Bill which provides that other clauses of the contract affected are to continue in force without the offending term. Section 24H further provides that a term of a contract can still be held void even if it has been partially or wholly executed. This is a novel idea as it provides more certainty as to the position of the parties in the midst of a continuing contract.
Concurrently with the advertising of the (non-)reduction in the megadevelopment’s size, Ms. Burden was defending the huge size of Atlantic Yards. It should be noted the that the huge size of Atlantic Yards may only be legally possible with the superblocking, which by transferring eliminated streets to a private owner, changes the FAR (floor to area ratio) calculations. FAR is a measure used to regulate density. In essence, if you want to state a lower FAR number you are virtually backed into superblocking, even if that does not truly achieve the “lower density” that the lower FAR number appears to suggest. See the Times story Atlantic Yards Developer Accepts 8% Reduction in Project, by Nicholas Confessore, (September 28, 2006):
It took the entire morning to get this done, and despite the difficult task, these young men never complained, were determined and positive the entire time! An absolute delight to work with these folks, and the quality of construction, well, we couldn't ask for anything better. Should you be in the PNW and are considering a coop, visit the Chicken Coop Store, and tell Tristan we sent you. You won't be disappointed.
That power/authority was given to you as part of your inheritance in Christ Jesus. You have entered into this position of authority because you are in Him.
Judy Blume saved me from my own tween apocalypse. I love all of her books.
We got to the Metroplex and watch with no amusement as all the time that had clicked off on the drive up began to click back on, pushing our 1:15 pm arrival time back to 1:45. When we got to Uncle Buck's Brewery and Steakhouse, we met Satan's friend, who complained about our arrival time: "I coulda slept another hour!"
~ Cavite Representative Joseph Emilio A. Abaya, a Liberal Party stalwart
“I imagine if you were going to tell me, you would already have done so.”
Amey, the public service provider, has been awarded the £2bn PFI contract to transform Sheffield’s roads. The contract which will last for twenty five years will see a major improvement to the city highway infrastructure which includes: 1,900km of road, 3,300km of footway, 36,000 highway trees, 500 traffic signals, 68,000 street lights, over 18,000 items of street furniture and 12,700 street name plates. The contract will also include services such as street cleaning, winter gritting and landscape maintenance. However, the Sheffield Telegraph (Thursday April 12th 2012, p. 13) has revealed that the project will be carried out on an area by area basis not as you would assume on ‘worst first’. This apparently has been decided on ‘the basis of that will offer better value for money’.
I actually enjoyed working for this company. Great machines to drive, just a pity I didn’t get to keep my own machine as in the prior job. This way, it becomes more of you. You keep it clean and I like to have a little pride in what I do.
That night, I hardly slept a wink. My mind was filled with troubled thoughts and strange emotions. The ghosts in my head were teasing me, taunting me.
Buff: Hungover? Oh, you mean you're hung over with euphoria.
Acts 16:29 The jailer called for lights, rushed in and fell trembling before Paul and Silas. 30 He then brought them out and asked, “Sirs, what must I do to be saved?”
A Bloomberg article says “100,000 farmers lost about 58 billion yen ($694 million) by March 1 [2012], or 25 percent of production” ( here). What the report does not do is list a detailed breakdown of the numbers showing fear among Japanese consumers, product restrictions by the Japanese government and restrictions by foreign governments. Without this information one has difficulty in knowing who lost what and why.
In a double boiler, melt the chocolate. Once the biscuits have cooled add a teaspoon of chocolate to the centre of a biscuit and press another on top. Repeat with remaining biscuits.
My local library was kind enough to request the book (for a very minimal charge) and it arrived just 5 weeks later, for use only in the library. I read through, and then took out my new portable scanning wand and captured several pages of info about Captain Slatter, including photos and more. Also, I photographed the same pages and the cover.
I use Skin79 Intense Classic BB Cream and I correct the most shiny areas with mark. ivory powder foundation, and I think it's just perfect for my skin.
Base Cardstock is Bazzill from Michael's, DPs are from Graphics 45 (the Magic of Oz Collection) and Making Memories (Paper Reverie - Sienne Floral).
As I turn the water off, I see Michael's blurry image through the frosted glass of the shower bounding into the bathroom. "Mommy, we got big trouble in the office. C'mon. It's Dy-dy," he says. I throw on my robe and hurry with him asking a flurry of questions concerned that Dylan is hurt. Dylan darts out of the office as we approach. Once I walk through the threshold of the door, I am greeted by a toppled Papasan chair whose parts have been thrown around. But the headline act is the paper shredder has been opened and overturned. Mounds of shredded paper are discarded all over the carpet with the tiniest pieces embedded in the carpet's nylon fibers. I am seething mad. I feel lousy and my kids won't even let me have the satisfaction of an uninterrupted shower. Why should I be surprised? My boys play together, of course, they find trouble together.
Declared intellectuals, as a group in any country, are not particularly noted for charitable, forgiving and understanding dealings with one another, and the German intelligentsia has quite a reputation for being particularly vicious with each other. It was no surprise then when his confession about his past led to widespread excoriation, particularly from many who had previously experienced the caustic character of comments about them by Grass. In a more detached way, the influence of his own guilt and embarrassment about his past provides a fascinating new aspect in an analysis of the roots of his literary and public personality, his writings and his utterances.
Despite the fact that The Koobas were among the most talented of the lesser known British beat bands, and were also fortunate enough to land an opening spot on the final British tour of fellow Liverpudlians, The Beatles, they were never able to turn these advantages into commercial success. In many ways, The Koobas followed a very similar trajectory to The Beatles in their early days, as the band had paid its dues playing the Star-Club in Hamburg, Germany and was signed by none other than Brian Epstein in 1964, eventually inking a recording contract with Pye Records (also home to The Kinks at the time). After releasing several solid R&B-tinged singles during the mid-sixties that went nowhere in the charts, The Koobas, now signed to EMI, decided to try their hand at psychedelia, recording their one and only album throughout 1968; however, the band fell apart just as their album was being released, a shame since The Koobas is a better-than-average psych-era concept album.
Happy Friday! Wow, did April fly by, or what? We are wrapping up National Poetry Month this week, and our inspiration image was chosen with Astronomy Week in mind.
Gæladrial – Restarted and Leveled my Worgen Druid from 1 to 14, without BoAs. Gæladrial I am leveling as Feral, at least for now. It just seems easier at low levels.
To remember your dream.
I'd always believed that even though fruits are healthy, since they do have sugar in them, you should still be careful about not eating too much of them. But according to different things I've read, this is not true. My only problem is that while I love most of the fruits mentioned, when I eat fruits a lot, I begin to want things that are not sweet, and I don't like a lot of the veggies mentioned, unless their either covered with cheese or butter. But I suppose since I'm not diving into some fad diet, it would be ok to add a little something to my veggies, especially if it gets me to eat more of them. I'm not a fan of fad diets; I don't believe they work, and usually are not healthy. But I think adding more about foods with negative calories as snacks and sides can only help to make us healthier.
Over at Art Journey, the challenge is...you guessed it...winter! Here are several cards for that challenge. Art Journey is Louise's company in the Netherlands, and they've recently translated their website into English for easier exploring. Their stamps are particularly suited to altered art, which is how many stampers use them.
A tourist once asked me if I thought Tom Jones had been influenced by a gorilla. “No,” I replied. “He was clearly influenced by the gospel, rock, folk, jazz and blues singers of his youth. But perhaps you meant to ask whether Tom Jones is genetically close to a gorilla.”
Authorities were investigating, but had made no arrests. The drugs' value was estimated at $5 million.
Sewing it would have not taken much longer but I had no desire to pull out the machine. Maybe at some point along the years I will sew over the glue.
1)Back to bright and early morning workouts. Running outside when it's not too cold. And my 30 Day Shred video on the mornings that it is. 5-6 days per week of working out. I feel so great on the days that I work out first thing in the morning. I love the time to myself. And starting the day this way helps me to make healthier food selections the rest of my day.
Looking to the future, do they have the players to stay in the Premier League? Starting in goal I believe they have two very good goalkeepers in Kelvin Davis and Bartosz Bialkowski. Davis is the number one and is very consistent having played nearly every game this season, and with over 600 games in his career he will not be fazed by playing in the Premier League.
Thus, Rosen offers the top five mistakes a company can make when considering tablet usage:
According to DHS, the definition of personal identifiable information
I have a few updates related to other posts i made:
Moody continues: “Technically, the Daily Sun broke the law when it published a picture - taken from the cellphone video of the gang rape - of the 17-year-old mentally ill girl because the media is not allowed to reveal or even hint at the identity of minors involved in crimes and court cases - and the same goes for sex-crime victims unless they give their consent (or, in the case of a minor, a parent's consent).
My great grandmother Hopie, instead of focusing on all of the titles given to or passed down to her, chose to simply live her life untitled. She set fancy and unique titles aside to selflessly serve all those she encountered. She invited others into her home, made food for church dinners and for those in need, gave of her resources, took her grandchildren, great grandchildren and great-great grandchildren fishing, called friends and family nearly every day, smiled at everyone she came across and although she never knew it, the number of lives my great grandmother Hopie positively effected was countless.
Too many mirrors make beautiful green egg-face,
After I figured out which maps would go on which letters, I got to work piecing it all together.
I’d wait as darkness fell and the chime of crickets swept over the area like the gentle rolling of thunder down distant canyons.
The demonstrators reacted violently by hurling mineral water bottles towards police vans and patrol cars, overturning a police patrol car, kicking a motorcycle mounted by a policewoman and grabbing a pistol belonging to a policeman.
We stopped that night in Arusha, tired, hot, and a little cranky (that last bit may have just been me). Taxi drivers circled the bus like hawks, looking for business. The moment they spotted me, drivers swarmed around, danging their car keys in their face and shouting, "Taxi, lady? Taxi? Mzungu, mzungu! Taxi!" My seatmate and new friend grabbed my by the elbow and steered me through the crowd to where we picked up my luggage. The professor with us snapped at the drivers to leave me alone, which they did immediately. "It is good to be old here!" He grinned at me as he pointed to his white hair, "Everybody listens."
Of course, this post made more sense in 2008 when I'd become fixated by the loathsome 'Oasis' adverts. Ever since writing this post I have searched in vain for the VW Casino man advert. Today I found it.
Unfortunately the light was coming down, so I had to shot with an aperture of 2.8 at 1/30 sec and the picture is a tiny bit soft. I don’t like this picture so much anymore, I can’t get over the fact that it’s soft, but hey, what is done is done.
Dw and the kids and I have been sitting around brainstorming.
Over the summer, Dr. Janet really got to know Ryan during the social skills class and then started the testing in October. As we walked into her office today, we weren't sure what to expect. We were already thinking about next year when Ryan is supposed to start Kindergarten but we aren't quite sure he is ready. And the thought of putting him in a classroom with 26 other kids, makes us very nervous. If we didn't get a diagnosis, we were considering holding him back a year in hopes that his social skills and speech would be better.
Welcome to my FIRST EVER blog hop, and what a better occasion that Cinco de Mayo to step into the world of blog hops. Although this is not a big holiday in Mexico as you might have read from the other blogs, this is an opportunity for those of us with Mexican roots to pay homage to our heritage and celebrate our Mexican background.
I hate to do this to you
and mold me as my maker
We made our crepes with Nutella and strawberries and it was just as good as I remembered it at Karen's when she shared this recipe with me earlier this year. I topped ours off with whipped cream and powdered sugar.
We were lucky. Some people are not so fortunate. I’m glad we were. We even had a rainbow after the storm with clear blue skies….
:: Stand-up comics have to deal with hecklers. You might think that usually a quip or two gets the job done...but not always. Some comics don't go for the surgical strike of a quick, devastating quip. Instead, they go for incendiary explosives, followed by salting the earth above their hecklers' dried remains so that nothing ever grows there again. (Foul language in every one of these...but if you watch any, be sure to watch Patton Oswalt's, whose takedown of his heckler achieves a kind of poetry.)
Desserts
In a bit after a seven or so mile ride I will pop in Starbucks or another coffee shop to chill for a bit again. How did I get so lucky to NOT have to work? Well, Mike and I labored over the decision. I know that sounds like a joke, but it isn’t. I really LOVE to hang with him, and he me, but I will be driving tomorrow towards Louisiana to visit with ill family. That’s a lot of driving, and that is what I would have had to do with Mikey–drive. That is hard on me. I swell. So much to the others pain we both felt I should spend today active so the drive wouldn’t hurt me so bad tomorrow. So my lovely day is one of those mixed blessing kinda things.
- B, 1/50 leaf shutter.
But he did manage in 1940 to score a gig that would win him -- or at least his voice -- immortality: providing the voice of Pinnochio's conscience in the classic cartoon feature. "When You Wish Upon a Star" won an Academy Award. And Edwards' recording of it was his last hit record.
TheRat, incest and murder are not funny topics. Also, why didn’t anyone in the 70′s know how to use a razor? Nobody needs to see that much untrimmed bush.
And guess who is going to help me organize my studio to the hilt? IKEA!
Contributed by Brad Thomas Parsons to Food and Wine
“I still feel weak. I still feel as if I’m not strong enough…to overcome these things. I’m caught between having the will to fight them, or just letting them be and just doing nothing, waiting, for God to make His way into these changes.”
I’m exactly 185cm tall. Seeing how I didn’t grow for 2 years, now I’m pretty sure it stopped. And when I compare with others, my ears stick out a lot and my eyes are rather big. My teeth are also very even. It’s the national good teeth. Hahaha.
I've got @ $30 invested in the 6 collections I used. I've already created this one great layout and have not even scratched the creative possibilities these collections still contain.
We probably shouldn’t hold our breath waiting for Minnesotans to demand full access to the news. However, there may be some — readers of Powerline who reside in that state — who could present a class action suit, in ACLU fashion, using Nahncee’s idea as their basis. The fact that the Strib deliberately and with forethought omitted crucial information about the questionable character of Mr. Ellison, particularly his extreme anti-Semitism, his ties to CAIR, etc., could be construed as a clear harm to the commonweal.
A young lady with Dissociative Identity Disorder walks into her therapist’s office. This is the same therapist she has been seeing for the past year. On this day she falls into her usual chair, looks down at her wriggling hands and tells her therapist, “I am so sorry. I am just so messed up. I really don’t mean it, but I’ve gotto stop telling these lies. These people inside of me…..the others that tell these horrid stories of abuse. They are just not real. I don’t know what’s wrong with me. Why I would make up such a thing, but I have to tell you it’s all a bunch of bullshit.”
I decided that in an effort tot save money, we would try it.
Whilst I'm only back for the day, I thought I would take a minute to let you know where I am.
Pro liar
Or have to talk real loud.
People are so afraid of the concept of being gay, and people need to realize we are equal. My generation is realizing the important thing is how honest you are– how kind you are. I have hope that people will get past the issue of sexual orientation. We should worry: is this person honest, what kind of human being is this? It is inhumane to mistreat people for their sexual orientation. It is our job to educate people and pull them out of the dark. You should not judge a person by their color, or if they wrap their head or not, or who they date. People’s personal lives are their business. My generation holds the thread of hope to stop pushing beliefs and hurtful words.
We love food and heating things up in the microwave and basically we would like to share some of our offerings with you. So without further delay…Feast your eyes on our picturesque dinning options and like we always do on Thursday “Best Caption Wins Something”:
Today should have been day one of a beautiful life.
8) BaghneQ is ______ for ______.
Judge Sexton said the victim was now suffering from the emotional impact of having sex with the accused, despite it being consensual.
DOUBLE WHOOPEE (1929) ***
Apparently the giant phallus is a void of the entire town FOR SOME REASON.
Fer these are scenes that grip the heart, an’when yer tears are dried,
Society tends to be pessimistic. Global warming, higher taxes, the New York Jets and Mitt Romney cause dark clouds to form in our brains. But, look at the bright side! Cheer up! Turn that frown upside down! Spoonful of sugar! Blah, blah, blah!
Whip: 1 cup/160 gramme Sugar and 2 eggs to consistency
Well, it so happened that I was turned back into a human being. On thursday. When I wasn’t excused. Close to nobody showed up, but it was a nice crowd of nobodies. I didn’t have to figth them, and they listened and asked sensible questions. Goodie!
Maybe that is why so many do quiet time in the morning instead of night. Perhaps God does prefer it that way. I always thought he wanted us to converse pretty much all the time. I thought quiet time was like a diet. As long as you eat the same calories in a 24 hour period your fat glands do not really care that much when you eat them. But perhaps I am wrong.
The oval face is truly blessed in all areas and is very well balanced in all features that could be wished for. No need to highlight or hide anything and simply go enjoy the world of frames available to you, wear whatever you are in the mood for and let nobody stop you!
Source: Alice Medrich’s Pure Dessert
In describing himself on the Unschooling Retreat website, he writes: "I am interested in people, and in the ways we create the world we live in, and the ways we don't. I am interested in how we've learned to think about and feel about things in particular ways, and in how we can make more conscious choices about the thoughts and feelings we have, and about the actions we take. I've come to believe that all of us can play a far more active role in the creation of our own individual experience that we commonly assume we can. And I believe we can take far more responsibility for the world we create together. Even though it is sometimes difficult, it is exciting and rewarding to explore different ways of thinking about who we are and how we live, different ways of being in relationship with other people, and different ways of seeing, accepting and changing the world we live in, here and now. There is so much inspiration to be found for living a richer life, personally and collectively, and I have become interested in making such Inspiring Stuff more widely available."
This is his journey and I am not responsible for him. I hope he finds his own way to forgive himself, and look within for the root of his betrayal. Face his inner demons. It doesn’t matter who he is with next, he has to look at himself first and allow love to flow. He is not a bad person and those childhood wounds? They are lessons, not a badge of identification or honour. Challenges make us stronger but more flexible. Not untrusting. Self-reliance and independence is great but sometimes we cannot do it alone. Help comes in many ways – from people, but also from the universe.
They will have to be responsible throughout the life of the bond.
Gosh what a horrible day here in Spain, its been raining for about 12 hours and the rivers are running down the roads. We will not be able to get out for a walk today so I think it will just be a quick visit to the supermarket in the car. We will have to empty the recycling bin too as it is full of tins, bottles and cartons and now it,s full of water too.
Come by Lemon Poppy Seeds today
Xandra’s weaknesses: She’s stubborn and persistent.
I'm not going to lie, I don't love this picture. It was early, neither of us have had coffee in 5 months, we were tired and I'm not quite sure that laying on a Dr.'s table gives the most flattering angle, but I still feel like it's an important picture to take. This is us, in the middle of a difficult journey....I'm glad we're still smiling. =)
However, the spokesman did not respond to questions about whether Mr Campbell or Blair’s other high profile former advisor, Jonathan Powell, were part of that advisory team. Powell helped establish Tony’s investment advisory company Firerush Ventures No 3, where he now works. Another former Downing Street spokesman, Tim Allan, who has now set up the PR company, Portman Group, is also known to be involved in advising Khazakhstan.
The book covers the giants of the whiskey industry (such as George Smith, Jim Beam and Jack Daniel), scenes from Prohibition, whiskey-making in such diverse spots as Scotland, Ireland, the U.S., South Africa, India and Japan, stories on the effects whiskey-making had on the development of several nations, and much more.
- Permiso or Disculpe, when passing or entering a place
* Hi Rosalie and welcome to tall tales & short stories. Would you like to tell us a bit about yourself?
June 24th, 2009
For now our priority is to tame them a little. They’ve been on a farmyard with “right to roam”, and are not used to much human contact on a day to day basis. If we’re going to be assisting births and milking, that will obviously have to change. Already within three days we have progressed from them charging away from us at first sign, to eating their luxury muesli mix (with fave beans and carob!) from the bucket in my hand this morning.
So I’m trying to decipher these alien words which she’s scribbled on the backs of colored flash cards, and I get to one about what triggers birth. One of the reasons was, and I quote, “pressure on o’s.” After a second, I realized I knew what that meant. “Pressure on the internal organs,” I announced. Boy, did that get me a look; I might as well have said, “birth fairies sprinkle magic dust on the mother’s tummy.” After I read the other things on the card and Kat deduced the subject, we sorted out the actual answer (pressure on the cervical openings), and kept going. But I think maybe I’m on to something here.
Next week Lisa and her parents unexpectedly moved to Ireland for a new life. We never connected, held hands or looked each other in the eyes ever again. There was talk years later, of her and her family moving to America to make the most of the Regan boom as the Irish economy stumbled through the 1980's.
That, and the fact that I am not a numpty, I hope the whole interview will go in my favour. Fingers crossed.
Hug.
Until one day the mirror
Remember the days when going to school was fun? When learning something new involved playing games, singing songs, and creating stories? Well presenting these methods might not go over so well in the workforce, but it doesn’t mean kids can’t have fun when their parents are at work. English courses for kids are some of the most valuable extracurricular activities parents can invest in for their children.
Then who came aboard?
"Send Nat a text message. What would you like to say to Nat?"
Your thoughts on raising money and epitaphs will be greatly appreciated.
By they way, all this westward flying meant we were actually sort of making our days longer. Aside from the first leg, all the flying was done in daylight. And we ended up with a 28 hour Saturday.
Good riddens, motherfucker!
The second day of the event first of all included a visit to the city coupled with an opportunity to eat the local pizza! In the evening, the remaining guests had a "closing" dinner by the pool of the Averno Damiani resort - right next to where the previous day event had been held.
To educate Americans about what is being done to their country, the Center for Security Policy in Washington D.C. — most emphatically not funded by petrodollars — has now released a ten-part online course about the Muslim Brotherhood in America.
Don't get me started on stances. Having a traditional karate background, my stances were far too long and wide for the liking of the Sensei's at the seminar.
*Follow the agent's submission guidelines to a T. Seriously! Their agency websites will give specific instructions. If they only take snail mail submissions, DO NOT EMAIL your work.
You gotta quit your bluffing
This may seem obvious, new mums must strengthen the pelvic floor muscles. Around 25-30% of postnatal women suffer with some form of stress incontinence after birth, and it’s vital to focus on them not just after birth, but for life really. You need to do pelvic floor exercises daily, perhaps more often if you have very little sensation there. It can take time for the muscles to react to conscious exercise too. Just keep sending the signal from your brain to the pelvic floor, even if you can’t feel it. Eventually it will switch on. You need to focus on both the fast-twitch muscle fibres eg squeeze and release, and the slow-twitch fibres too eg draw up, hold and slowly release for effective rehabilitation. If you’re in doubt, ask your Doctor who may send you to a Women’s Health Physio for further treatment. No one should be living with stress incontinence as a part of day-to-day life, and in the majority of cases, all that’s needed is some strength, endurance and tone back in these muscles to get them doing their job properly again.
With the kidlet and myself being run-down.. I haven't even had one minute to sit at my lil craft table.
2 bundle
4.) My first link up! Ashley, and comments from a few others, have inspired me to do my first link-up next monday for my Monday Confessional! So ladies, put your pride to the side, and join me next Monday for a little confessional. Your conscious will then be clean, even if your hair isn't ;)
Happy Fall, Ya'll! tee hee, I couldn't resist a little southern greeting. :))
When I first discussed cover art with Imajin Books, the image of a small, dark-haired boy popped into my mind. Little Tommy Seaton is at the heart of the Safe Harbor story, and I wanted him to be on its cover. And he is.
This is yet another in a long string of fascinating, highly original compositions by Michael Pisaro. On this piece, Pisaro alternates in three-minute segments between two types of material: a duet between Barry Chabala (guitar) and Katie Porter (bass clarinet); and an electronic studio assemblage of field recordings, organ samples and other processed bits and pieces. The two groups of material alternate throughout the piece, but the whole never feels disjointed. Instead, Pisaro seems to be exploring, through two very different approaches, a unified territory of tranquil held tones and meditative late-night quietude. The instrumental sections focus on sustained tones from the bass clarinet and answering guitar pings, creating an aural atmosphere not all that different from the stretched, droning organ notes of the electronic sections, so that the various sources, acoustic and electronic, "live" or post-processed, begin to bleed into one another. There's also a lot of variety in the textures and sounds that Pisaro builds from these disparate sources, with the organs sometimes ringing out in rich, bell-like resonances and other times sending out bassy reverberations. The instrumental sections, meanwhile, gradually grow more complex and intricate, progressing from the stasis and simplicity of the earliest segments to the spacious melodicism of the final instrumental stanzas. [buy]
I'm not going the show anyone the error of their ways or their thinking.
So that is the only one response, and it’s a brutal one: accept that we are powerless to change Africa, and leave them to sink or swim, by themselves.
When we have poorly devised and poorly functioning systems, we will wear out ourselves and our team.
Being from a wealthy family, she had strong ties to the British peerage and intellectual life and when she married Edward Montagu, a wealthy man with extensive holdings she became one of the wealthiest women of her era. However she devoted this wealth to fostering English and Scottish literature and relief of the poor. And along with her friend, Elizabeth Vesey and several others they organised a women's literary discussion group - The Bluestocking Society - a revolutionary step away from traditional, non-intellectual, women's activities at that time.
Red Rocket takes off into the glass with explosive carbonation and portrays a garnet color and tan cushiony foam leaving plenty lacing. Aroma initially opens with sweet hops then settles down with some fruit, burnt sugars, and roasted malt. Wonderful flavors of balanced hops, brown sugar, and roasted malt. No other red ale exemplifies the style so well while incorporating hops into every interaction in the brew to the bitter end - love it. Another amazing beer from Bear Republic – also try their Hop Rod Rye.
You would think.
This week I have had a cold and a piano exam (grade 6, eek!), I don't know which one was worse. Do any of you's play instruments?
In Journalism we accomplished so much. We published a ton of articles. It was awesome.
I learned this lesson the hard way. When I was in university I was the VP Corporate Development of our local chapter of AIESEC, an international student organization that facilitates international work exchanges. Even though I had the fancy title, I never viewed myself as a VP; I still viewed myself as a university student. Therefore I didn’t feel confident marketing the exchange program to employers.
and barbwire fingers
I've decided to choose a theme this year in the A-Z Blog Challenge, which starts April lst and goes the entire month, or until we get to letter 26. This will be the second year I have done it. I met some wonderful people last year. This year the group is about twice as large.
That's normal though, I suppose, and the more I thought about it, the more sense it made. My measured response to my accomplishment has even started to look like a sort of progress, in the macro sense. Look how far I've come. I've written three novels. I've run this particular marathon three times and I'm still standing and looking forward to tomorrow's run. I guess I'm a writer, after all. Having that thought did make my feet start tapping. So I put some old Rolling Stones on the box (so to speak), poured myself a glass of wine, and, for a short time, let 'er rip.
Brown the ground beef, onion and garlic. Drain and add seasoning.
“That one there – there’s no deposit on that one!”
Why has this unrelenting effort mostly failed?
If you are going to read this, borrow it from your library but don't add to your collection.
Did you see it today?
I matted my background paper onto sheeny, mirror-effect blue paper and attached to a plain white card blank. I cut a border from blue card using a Martha Stewart edge punch and cut flourishes from mountboard using the Tim Holtz Elegant Flourishes die. I coloured the flourishes with Inka Gold and attached to the card. I coloured plain white paper flowers with metallic gold pen and attached to the card, layering them with blue Prima flowers.
I did go out to eat with my aunt (my mom's sister) and that was a nice treat.
The “Now Later” Bracelets Spices up any wardrobe!
After a belch, Clementine tosses the empty glass to the floor. Her crudeness no longer holds any allure. Then she notices the book that will not offer her any cure.
So, how can the locals of a food paradise be left out in snacking between their meals or enjoy light bites at any time of the day?
Glad he made his plane, though.
Her brain allows one half-formed thought to pass:
Yesterday I set off to visit the legendary Hotel California in Todos Santos, Mexico. The Eagles made this song famous in the 70’s|(listen to it here on YouTube as performed at the 2007 Grammys.) According to the locals - Todos Santos was a town that the Vietnam draft dodgers escaped to in the late 60’s. When communicating with home they would discreetly say they were staying at ‘The Hotel California’, hence the words of the song:
Fans suit up as a super villain with an array of amazing powers and weapons to overthrow governments and take over cities in the ultimate fight for world domination.
Looking Forward To: The boyfriends birthday, Summer series, getting well and truly into Uni, City and Colour.
“With the increased emphasis on eating more fruits and vegetables, we need to be vigilant about the food we’re producing and serving,” Lunder says.
It's hard to know where to start, so I guess in the middle would be as good a place as any. When I began working as a special education teacher, I was also going to school to obtain my master's degree, as a condition of keeping my job. The lack of time, two kids to support, and a SO (significant other) who put all my art stuff into the attic made it all but impossible for me to make art. I rationalized it to myself this way: "What good is art, anyway? It doesn't bring in any money, and I'm completely broke. It doesn't mean a thing to most people, except maybe as a way to decorate their living rooms." I told myself, " It doesn't help anyone; no one needs art."
The only problem is the hotel have to hire a crane to lift the hired grand-piano in through his bedroom window which they have to take out in order to get said piano indoors…
Barbara Daigneault, 22 - mechanical engineering
the road with him along with a super long extension cord so he is ready
I was asked to review Miriam Barton's Meatless Meals for Meat Eaters cookbook and this was one of the recipes that immediately caught my eye. I love beans and I cook them all the time adding spices to them as they cook for flavor. So when I saw this recipe had onions, lime juice, cilantro and a bunch of other great flavors mixed into the beans, I knew that I would love this recipe.
Any tips, tricks or ideas are most welcome!
There’s also the classic and very popular local Courtship Tea, sold in a gold tin, labeled as a “romantic blend for Lords & Ladies, blended exclusively for Donna and Ron Lasko, Tea Consultants & Lecturers,” on Cape Cod’s historic town of Osterville. It’s a “blend of the finest black teas and the essence of ginger.” It has a delightfully strong (but not too strong) gingery flavor. It’s a great winter tea. Or a valentine’s tea!
After debating on what would truly make me happy, I've came to the conclusion.... that I need to be a veterinarian. As much as I love animals and as passionate as I am about them, I just feel so compelled to help them. I know that no matter what job I have, that there will always be a down side to them. I get that. I just know that I need to do it now rather than waiting if I'm going to do it.
okay......
Greed/Self Interest – Appreciation
LZ Granderson wrote, "Permissive Parents, Curb your brats" which left me feeling sad and upset. Here was an gay man of African descent who has won awards from organizations such as the Gay and Lesbian Alliance Against Defamation which promotes "understanding, increases acceptance, and advances equality." A man who would not stand for hate speech towards members of the gay community and yet he spews it towards children. A man who subtly advocates for corporal punishment in our schools says that parents should not rule out spanking young children and yet I seriously doubt he would support violence towards LGBT people.
I am PRIME example of what NOT to do. LOL.
Five of them, running towards Shatterbury station, which lay a couple of hundred yards up track beyond where the Spur met the mainline. They saw no trains as they ran, with Solemn in front, Features, Cleft and Bouncer bringing up the rear. Ben was sandwiched between, in case he had second thoughts on the matter. Ben had no second thoughts. Infiltrating this gang was the force's priority in Shatterbury, and he was going to be the one to break it open.
but the owner of the Grist Mill Restaurant
Now the post office won’t take any such thing….
After offering such a dire diagnosis, the astonishing thing about the ancient spiritual teachings is that they offer a complete solution. They suggest that the world of karma, even though it surrounds us and ensnares us at every moment, is not fully real. Beyond it lies actual reality, which is reached by cultivating the subtler side of the human nervous system.
I'll admit it, there are many magical things about winter, but I always struggle when it shows up. The bitter cold of the East Coast seriously messes with my style. I don't want to leave the apartment in anything besides my huge down jacket and snow boots... with sweat-pants and ear muffs. A big fuzzy blanket would be nice too. Just to top off that awesome look.
I'm joining in on The Sweet Stop sketch challenge with my Quirky Bunny card. You know how you find a sketch and all the fireworks of creativity just start shooting off in your head? Well that's what happened with this terrific sketch! I thought the eggs and carrots were the perfect embellishment given this sketch.
“I can understand that” Trent said, standing up. “Thanks for letting me borrow Geoff though, I'll have him back in one piece.”
In traditional Europe, women dressed modestly and wore little or no make-up. An unjudaised European woman has more in common with a Muslim woman as far as dress and fidelity are concerned, than with the damaged image-obsessed girls and women of our current unfortunate times. If the EDL were really concerned with defending England, they would be campaigning for the outlawing of pornography, the protection of marriage (real marriage between one man and one woman), the punishment of adultery (by either party), the treatment of homosexuals, and the adoption of modest dress by men and women alike. Instead they defend perversion and campaign for all women to dress and act as low-class call girls, regardless of faith, marital status, or age ( like the pædophile Simon Sheppard, they like 'em young).
Documentary, Rated G, 103 Minutes
I said I would not send my son to school without a behavioral plan developed with our ABA put into place, in writing in the IEP.
DDDB spent $189,694 in legal fees, including $77,634 to Young, Sommer and $101,286 to Emery, Celli, Brinckerhoff & Abady, the New York City firm handling eminent domain litigation.
Oh, the For Better! It's the stuff parental dreams are made of. The first smile and first steps, the soccer goals and dance recitals, and that march across the stage for the happy hand-off of a diploma. We cling forever to the moments--and the memories--of the For Better.
Fine, I really am fine,” I replied. Then I began to wonder why.
All the times you saw how exhausted I was and never pat on my shoulders
Sorry about that. However, in the meantime, I do just feel like a slacker. A failure. Even though I'm NOT failing. I'm just stalled. I KNOW I'm not failing. But that old black sludge just keeps bubbling up and trying to tell me I am. So... like Tinkerbell needing claps and "I do believe in fairies" to stay alive... help the Slacker out a little here. Just remind me that progress takes time and as long as I keep looking forward and not back, I'll eventually reach my intended destination.
k&co papers - amy butler belle
They say the mark of a true writer is someone who writes everyday. Anywhere. Anytime. Thank goodness I never made that claim. I love to write. Sometimes. It can be cathartic. Cleansing. Freeing. But sometimes it is like picking at a scab that is not quite yet healed underneath.
Captain America has a metal shield? What is he going to do with that? Is he going to use it to protect him in frat party from flying pies? Come on!
The last UK expo was in 2009 and featured 38 exhibitors including Australian employers, government organisations and relocation service providers. More than 1800 people from the UK who had skills in high demand in Australia also attended.
Every day you hear stories of taxi drivers ripping off tourists, its a world wide thing.
PSIONIC ABILITY: Nil
I could 'pick a phrase' quite easily;
I was surprised to learn that Old World is now producing a root beer line called Cole’s Old West Root Beer and the sample I tried in the taproom was first rate. I took home a growler of Cole’s Old West Root Beer for Mrs. Beer Rant and she gave it a definite thumbs up. According to Patrick, growlers of Cole's Old West are selling faster than growlers of their beer. Hmmm. There’s certainly a broader market for non-alcoholic beverages out there, I’d imagine.
As of today, more than 2000 people have signed from more than 50 countries and hundreds of people have left negative comments about Nestlé on the petition site. All International Organizations, under WHO and UNICEF's direction to protect breastfeeding from commercial pressures to artificially feed babiesincluding IBFAN (International Baby Food Action Network), WABA, (World Alliance for Breastfeeding Action), BMA (Baby Milk Action, UK) and IBFAN Switzerlandhave signed and written letters asking the Mayor to cancel his partnership. There has been worldwide outcry for Newark to stop this partnership but, unfortunately, it has fallen on deaf ears.
The three of us seek the shelter of Seokguram Grotto. In order to reach it, we must follow the lantern-lit path. Snow and the dusty path are underfoot and muffled, cheerful groups make their way up the mountainside.
Member of Parliament Canada, Alex Atamanenko, of the New Democratic Party, feels that if he can present Parliament with 10,000 Signatures Protesting Horse Slaughter in Canada, and Supporting his Bill C-322, An Act to amend the Health of Animals Act and the Meat Inspection Act (slaughter of horses for human consumption), thus prohibiting the importation or exportation of horses for slaughter for human consumption as well as horsemeat products for human consumption, that he will be able to have the bill adopted into LEGISLATION.
Lupus brings on many challenges and many victories. Today I am sitting in the cancer infusion center at the hospital getting my tenth Benlysta infusion, and am pondering the good, the bad and the ugly of lupus.
The new home sits on .47 of an acre and it's fully fenced :) I'm so excited for Drake to just run and burn energy!!! (I think I've used my yearly limit of exclimation points!)
Callum, vamp that works for the theatre is out scouting new performers in Paris. That where he sees a sexy werewolf in a club. He has been watching her for a few nights and must meet her.
Things are interesting for us right now. I quit my job, we moved 1,000 miles north, and we’re spending our days in a completely different manner than we’re accustomed to. It’s a time of great change, to say the least. Change is scary for many people, but over the years we have seemed to thrive on it for some reason. Change can be hard because each change comes with a new set of expectations for all of us, individually and collectively. But for us, change also presents an opportunity to be introspective and ensure we’re on the right course, that our needs and wishes haven’t allowed us to drift too far from what is important to us or from the direction in which we were headed. Of course, change is much easier to navigate when it comes free of expectations of how things “should” turn out.
14:36 Evelyn Dance Band led by Orlando Julius -erora miliki
Catching subsonic waves
After several weeks of spring yard work and cleaning out the gardens to reveal the tiny shoots of greenery just peeking through the damp earth, I woke up to several inches of snow this morning. I knew it was coming, had read the news the evening before, and when I finally went to bed shortly before midnight the snow was already starting to come down. I have to say, I not only don't mind, but I'm feeling quite peaceful about it. There's something very calming about a late snow, as though the momentum we had been riding requires a hiatus, a breather, a reminder to Be Here Now,* to be a part of the great I Am.
Mr. Lynn makes the case that Amazon’s dominance isn’t just a story of an industry disrupted by online commerce and digital upheaval, it’s about the abandoning of New Deal era protections of retailers in 1975 (promoted by backers as a means to fight inflation, says Mr. Lynn) and what he portrays as a shift in 1981 in the Justice Department’s interpretation of antitrust law based on “Chicago School” theories of efficiency and consumer welfare. The upshot appears to be that non-consumer markets (business-to-business markets and labor markets) are often insufficiently protected from monopolies.
-Add the chopped broccoli in it and give a quick toss.Add turmeric powder,stir once again.Cover and cook for 7-10 minutes on medium heat.
Helmet and rod
So there I was last night putting together a Prog Rock playlist for the iPod when I really started to listen to the lyrics of Dancing With The Moonlit Knight by Genesis.
This book improved on the first and was a very enjoyable read.
J460 Community Journalism will provide hands-on experience, using the latest digital technology in news-gathering and presentation. WFHB presents a daily, half-hour local newscast as well as five separate hour-long public affairs programs, including programs targeting African-Americans, GLBT, and Hispanic communities. WFHB is a leader in news podcasting, with its programs regularly being downloaded around the world.
I have started stitching a new pattern now as I finished all the projects I needed to and I was so excited to start on something new!! There is nothing like starting a new cross stitch. I've had this kit tucked away for over a year in my tub and I finally bought her out. It is a mirabilia design called halloween fairy who I've always loved! I bought the kit once when I went to a stitchy show so everything was in the kit already. I am stitching it on 32 count natural linen from zweigart along with cresent colour thread again and beads by mill hill. This is my progress so far which I only started about a week ago.
basket full of candies + hungry pregnant woman = bad idea
-Don't say, "Be grateful for the children you have." If your mother died in a terrible wreck and you grieved, would that make you less grateful to have your father?
Their breath synchronized
The Wok charred salmon was an award-wining dish of Chef Daniel Koh. Indeed, the dish deserved to to be awarded. The salmon was served slightly charred on the outside but the inner was 80% cooked. Set atop a bed of braised leeks, tomatoes and lady’s finger. We enjoyed the mild-tasting salmon and the vegetables in the broth.
I'm a law-abiding citizen. A "standup guy", if you will.
So I wondered how I would go about doing the photo shoot. What poses would I use? How would these pictures be different from your average missionary companionship photo? It occurred to me to go to google images and there I typed in "lds missionaries working" and found all kinds of inspiration.
Things I love about the garden in August?
I've seen remarks from ordinary people, even people I know, who don't dig OWS. They have decided that THEY know how OWS should be run: Get a leader, get an agenda, focus on jobs.
You’re also going to need a onion, some mushrooms, and six or seven eggs (only one shown here). Figure for each matzah, you’ll need somewhat less than one egg. A half a package of matzos is like seven or eight matzos.
PS 50;10-15;
And so, I hear you ask. What next?
and I still remain
If you are reading this blog and you have a gay, bisexual or lesbian family member, maybe you should try to see things from what I call the “big picture perspective.” If they died tomorrow, would you still cling so tightly to your beliefs that they were a “bad” person? Or would you not go to their funeral because they were gay? You only have one life here on earth, and whether or not you believe in an afterlife, wouldn’t it be best to treat your loved ones with respect and concern while you are still here to do that? What kind of legacy do you want to leave? Do you want your grandchildren to remember you as the person who refused to love their mother/father and accept her/him for all that she/he is? Do you want your flesh and blood children to spend their life wondering why you do not accept them simply because they are gay? Or do you want to leave a legacy of love, acceptance and kindness to your fellow human beings?
I could eat two or three of these and have to really control myself not to make me another one.
Through the evening I hear about two men who went to the North Pole in the dead of winter and found open water where it should have been frozen, hence an impending global warming disaster. But they were dauntless explorers as they jumped in the water and swam from pack ice to pack ice.
I’m always drawn to work from this revitalized embroidery art movement that has been gaining in popularity in recent years. I think it is the contrast of this older and traditionally domesticated craft with a lot of tattoo and contemporary imagery that I like. I spotted Bec’s work, Stella & Fawks, at the AGP Triennial which brought me to her website and subsequently compelled me to contact her to send over some images and info to share here.
2. You must be sent on a particular mission.
FG=1.018@70F
The Wisdom of God guides me in the way that I should go. I only act and go in the direction that the Spirit leads because that’s the path of success! My heart is open today, to receive divine instructions that’ll guide me in the path of my prosperity and destiny in Christ Jesus Name! Amen!
“Babası iyi bir adamdı. Eski topraktı bizim Ahmet.”
Selvey, the man who visited the billboard site and made the comparison to Detroit, called the billboard a hit to his soul.
I'd bet money that Sheila was actually nude in the bathtub there, because, I think she was that sexy! Sheila also looked good in Jerry Warren's THE INCREDIBLE PETRIFIED WORLD. In this scene, Alex yells for Gypsy to shaddup!
treat in his lunches, but they
Thursday – A woman has been dating a man for the past year and a half and they know they want to get married. The issue is that he wants to move in with her first before they get engaged, and she refuses to move in with him before an engagement. Their respective opinions stem from past experience, and so they are at an impasse.
12 Let's Spend The Night Together
2. I did not celebrate Earth Day. I did not even send a card. Sorry Earth. I’ll try to do better next year.
Coming soon…..
Egg (optional), 1 pc
Morning all! Hope everyone had a wonderful Mother's day. Have another lil thing I made for my friend who just had the baby. Just wanted to make her a lil mini album. This is a Laura Denison design called Special Delivery. She does absolutely beautiful work.
I've been keeping track of what I've spent for this space...and so far it's very little considering I got new furniture like a huge t.v. cabinet (I'm talking a 9 foot by 6 foot) and a coffee table....other than that everything else has been recycled....gotta love recycling ;o)
Have you ever thought about how we appear at different times to the Lord and to angels, and even to demons–to the unseen spiritual world?
Time was a friend of the pilot who guided the waves to the meaning of light in the East
I'm continuing to tackle Everest today the pile of ever growing ironing that turns up at the end of the week I will tell you if I reach the top lol
Zucchini Lasagna!!! The idea is genius. I came across Gina's recipe on one of my favorite healthy cooking blogs: Skinnytaste. The recipe includes all of the typical lasagna ingredients - flavorful, thick sauce, ground meat, and lots of ricotta, parm/reggiano and mozzarella cheese. But no lasagna noodles. That clever Gina simply sliced zucchinis into long, thin strips and replaced the lasagna noodles with this low-cal, low-carb vedgie substitute. With the glorious sauce, fresh basil, loads of cheese and ground meat I can honestly say the lasagna noodles weren't missed and it 100% fulfilled my lasagna craving.
Political Correctness can reach absurd levels. Early in June 2006, Canadian police arrested a group of men suspected of planning terror attacks. The group was alleged to have been “well-advanced on its plan” to attack a number of Canadian institutions, among them the Parliament of Canada, including a possible beheading of the Prime Minister, and Toronto’s subway. However, the lead paragraph of newspaper Toronto Star’s story on the arrests was: “In investigators’ offices, an intricate graph plotting the links between the 17 men and teens charged with being members of a homegrown terrorist cell covers at least one wall. And still, says a source, it is difficult to find a common denominator.” Royal Canadian Mounted Police Assistant Commissioner Mike McDonell said that the suspects were all Canadian residents and the majority were citizens. “They represent the broad strata of our community. Some are students, some are employed, some are unemployed,” he said. However, there was one common denominator for the suspects that wasn’t mentioned: They were all Muslims. The front page article in the New York Times (June 4), too, was a study in how to avoid using the dreaded “M” word. The terrorist suspects were referred to as “Ontario residents,” “Canadian residents,” “the group,” “mainly of South Asian descent” or “good people.” Everything conceivable, just not as “Muslims.”
They were still in a bit of a mourning process I guess, so they were talking about old memories & other things as they moved stuff, I remember walking to the entrance of their open apartment door to see if they needed help; but I think that they were outside putting something in an automobile(s) (I think that one or two other people drove up to talk with them and/or help them in the parking lot), so no one was in their apartment, and I remember seeing an old arcade system in their apartment as I stood in the doorway & it had the name of the game written on it in English that I could read but I do not remember what it said.
Barbecue the chicken on a preheat grill (you can also bake this at 375-400 degrees for about 20 minutes too). Baste with some of the sauce (you can leave some aside to pour or dip the chicken in after it's cooked too). Keep an eye on the chicken, you don't want it to burn! Cook until chicken is no longer pink in the middle about 5-7 minutes on each side. Enjoy!
Lately in all my blogs I haven’t been posting many pictures because the only pictures I take are of my kitty Zoey and I am pretty sure that Dustin and I are the only ones that enjoy that. Dustin has complained that there hasn’t been many pictures so I am just going to put random ones up.
They draw substantial sums of money from taxpayers and then sit back while the taxpayers implement strategy at their own cost.
Tears in the silence
Start of Boil 5.5
Now, in the modern era the gaming industry makes more money than Hollywood - article is here. Yes, you read that right - the gaming industry makes more money than our movies, with Angelina Jolie, Brad Pitt and other assorted idiots.
Anyhow, Forever Sunshine is quite pretty, not too sweet, and fits into that seasonal transition slot nicely. Available now in Shower Gel, Body Lotion, Eau de Toilette, Triple Moisture Body Cream, and Fragrance Mist.
You will still be able to place orders online but NO orders will be filled or shipped on those dates.
Or I might ask: How much grace have you been shown? What are the depths of your transgressions that God has forgiven and forgotten as far as the east is from the west? I don’t need to spill profound theology or philosophical thoughts on this matter. All I have to do is ask you to examine yourself: What has God forgiven you?
Of course it is important to spend time thinking about what our children need and what we need when we are away (and when we are home) and of course we must dialogue with all those in our life about how we can best take care of those we love, but can’t we do all this without turning any of it into a plan or strategy, without aiming a laser pointer at it?
I’m including her as part of the Beatles A to Z because I believe her influence on Paul McCartney helped to ensure the endurance of the Beatles music, especially in the aftermath of John Lennon’s murder in 1980. After their marriage in 1969, Paul adopted Linda’s daughter Heather. After Linda and Heather settled into life in London with Paul, things began to become even more contentious with the Beatles.
Afterwards I talked to Elaine, Luke Bitmead’s mother who has had a terrible time since Luke died. Last December Pip was so ill it was the worst time of my life, and while I try not to dwell on that, it’s obviously in my thoughts. My experience has been nothing like Elaine’s, but it was still good to compare notes about loss and how to move on.
Blame and Rachel Alexandra are also retired. It’s a shame that race horse careers are so brief. Just when we grow attached, they’re gone.
Boots: Barrett's.
The Crucible – Raleigh Little Theatre presents Arthur Miller’s 1952 allegorical drama about the Salem witch trials. Directed by Haskell Fitz-Simons. This week: Friday and Saturday 8:00, Sunday 3:00. Continues through April 29. Sutton Theatre, RLT, Raleigh.
"I don’t much care where--" said Alice.
'The pain went on for a long time, but I thought it was partly due to my hangover.' Nevertheless, she underwent the process again and again. In the weeks that followed, it became her party trick.
this reminds me of my saudi friend who quite some years ago went to a performance of a visiting circus here in jeddah with her friend.. it was a mixed gathering, i have to mention.. and how weird did they feel when during the whole performance they were like the only ones clapping and cheering for the actors.. the circus stopped coming shortly after...
Like I said, don’t think that I write this from a position of having lived the fairytale/dream life. I don’t. I write from this position because I know how tough life can be. But here’s the thing – your glass can be half full, or your glass can be half empty – that’s something you can control – because you choose how you want to be.
Sunny, thanks for stumbling upon my "new to blogland" craft blog. I feel like it is still a project in the making, but I am flattered that you decided all the randomness should be shared. Plus, I now get to see all the great projects you come up with!
Your breath is sweet and weak
This usually works as a de facto filtering system ensuring that prurient content does not rate highly for common search terms, but also mean that unexpected results can shoot up the rankings if they receive a flurry of links, as appears to have been the case with the Obama photo.
So, I start the application up, it breaks straight away, complaining about a tomcat ‘SESSIONS.ser’ file.. a quick read around indicates a tomcat version change, caused by the updated dependencies.
This ritual was called aischrologia, translated as "saying ugly things."
Registers were soon ringing again as bags marched out the door for $29.99 a kilo. Olive oil tastings and a musical duo offering further lingerings to the 150+ crowd passing through. Quote of the day came from a woman sampling the lorded cheese, who exclaimed, sarcasm free, “That’s awesome cheese! Tastes like stinky feet”.
Drive, She Said release a ‘best of’ with two new songs via AOR Heaven. A band that never quite broke the big time mainly as they came out just as grunge was hitting but for harmony filled AOR with lashings of keyboards this is for you. Grand Illusion are also back on the same label and I am glad to report their pomp led rock is still in place none more so than on ’157th Breakdown’ which includes a guest spot from Mike Slammer.
One act of nature had changed the face of this town.
Now then, what is worrying is that negation is at the heart of what is considered by the modern westerner as true. One should imo scratch quite a bit around that spot.
“Who said that (I met with the Prime Minister)? Did Datuk Seri Najib say that?” he told reporters after casting his vote at SK Seri Penanti, Permatang Pasir here on Tuesday.
Now I run when I feel like, like to chill and watch various reality TV shows.
The first recipe was made for my girl's night deck party this past spring. The theme was herb-inspired so we concluded the meal with lemon mint ice cream. If you like lemon you will love this.
I ran everything except for the dough through my food processor.
If for some reason, you cant enter the code at the end, convo me at Etsy or email me at kc.costumecouture and we can work something out - I usually will invoice you through paypal although I can take your credit cards now!
“Ambition is a dream with a V8 engine.”
I was expecting the worst on Saturday and was surprised by how well it went. Lines are lines, so be it, but they were a helluvalot better organized than last year. No chairs and no big coolers meant more room for everybody. I liked how they handled guest taps too. At the end, they put Firestone Walker Sucaba on tap. Damn good shit. If they had put a lot more on tap at once, then all the good stuff would have been gone early. The amount of 3F beer was great too. They could use portalets in the carryout purchase line and around the industrial park for pre-entry waiting. But otherwise, I have nothing bad to say other than I didn't win. But that's just $50 I didn't have to spend.
Equality masks hierarchy. Dr.Frank Ellis left Leeds University after an Inquisition for speaking of, amongst other things, “humane repatriation.” The University stated: “Dr Ellis has acted in breach of our equality and diversity policy, and in a way that is wholly at odds with our values. Second, in publicising his personal views on race, Dr Ellis has recklessly jeopardised the fulfilment of the University’s obligations under the Race Relations (Amendment) Act 2000. As a public body, the University is required under that Act to promote good relations between people of different racial groups.” Modern society has been built on the foundation of "equality" and therefore statements like this type threaten its roots. The analogy with the 17th century Papacy persecuting Galileo is apposite. Yet the elites are a hierarchy. The law was passed by the rulers then acted on by bureaucrats and academics lower down the hierarchy and finally the students protested obediently. Equality is imposed from the top, down a hierarchical chain of authority. That is the natural state and our recognition of natural hierarchy is only acknowledging what Liberals and Cultural Marxists try to deny!Nationalist Conservatives are protective of civil society which took centuries to grow! If we are split up by introducing masses of aliens, the basis of civility, which is trust, is destroyedbecause they have different ambitions and goals and each group become rivals and neither we nor they, know when historical enmity will surface.A major value is Tradition: ribs that hold communities together. One of the most important is our language and there is a new political vocabulary developing, un-self consciously. Take the word English. During the Empire the home countries were subsumed under the word British and it is PC to say British now but people are describing themselves as English, Scottish, Welsh and Ulster to emphasise their national identity. This happened with flags and the authorities’ rationalisation against is re-claim them from extremists! We need a concrete vocabulary with which to explicate the world around us and describe human nature. The Welsh have it right in their great anthem “Land of my Fathers”. “English” is changing as the English affirm their collective identity, mentally disentangle from the EU and the term British disintegrates. This reflects change in British relationships. Country is vapid but land means something. Anglo Saxon words are folksy and Latin more abstract so our political vocabulary requires old English words. Joseph de Maistre, the Savoyard counter-revolutionary, encapsulated the unreality of abstractions in his famous quote, ”In the course of my life I have seen Frenchmen, Italians, Russians; ... but man I have never met” The ruling bureaucrats of the E.U. and our regional Government are restricting our vocabularies through P.C. so that we speak and think in the way they want us to, and are devising an artificial way of describing Muslims to avoid calling some terrorists. This totalitarian control of thought through language began with the French revolutionaries, was continued by the Bolsheviks, Mao’s cultural revolution and in the west by cultural Marxists with their gradual cultural revolution.
Scientists can invent technologies, manufacturers can make products, engineers can make them function and marketers can sell them, but only designers can combine insight into all these things and turn a concept into something that is desirable, practical, commercially successful and adds value to people’s lives.
No. Wait. I hate them!
From October 20 - November 1, the Jawaher collection will be on public display in London at the SWAROVSKI CRYSTALLIZED™ lounge at 24 Great Marlborough St, London, opposite Liberty.
So my laptop is once again broken. My screens color has turned completely orange. It looks as if Jack Skeleton came in the middle of the night and did things, terrible terrible things. By the color test I did, it's the blue that's pretty much dead which in turn is affecting the other colors of the spectrum. Of course with my luck, this thing is no longer under Warranty since my father forgot to add an extended one when he first bought it for me as a gift. By the looks of things, I'm going to have to some how pull about $150.00 out of my ass to buy a new screen and replace it myself.
Geese Head North
Tak Matsumoto is known to millions all across Asia as the leader of the Japanese hard rock group B’z. Born in Osaka on March 27, 1961, Matsumoto founded B’z in 1988 with vocalist Koshi Inaba. Together the duo has racked up numerous chart hits throughout Asia. Matsumoto’s skills as a guitarist led him to become one of only five guitar players to be licensed by Gibson Guitars for a signature model version of their classic Les Paul guitar. The other artists were Jimmy Page (Led Zeppelin), Slash (Guns ‘n’ Roses), Joe Perry (Aerosmith) and Ace Frehley (Kiss). Good company, indeed! He recently put together the Tak Matsumoto Group featuring Eric Martin of Mr. Big on vocals and Jack Blades of Damn Yankees on bass. You’ll hear the group performing their hit song Never Goodbye over the closing credits of Ultraman: The Next.
3,700: Number Of Tax Delinquents Who Received Stimulus Funds.(Government Accountability Office, April 2011)
'What did you just say? I didn't get half of that.' She burst out laughing and said, 'You're a Limey now!'
Some resources for those who want to help (many of these are also aggregating efforts for other Middle TN counties as well):
Booking Window: 6/28 - 11/18/11
Have you heard of Illinois bourbon? Well, many years ago, there was lots of whiskey being made in Illinois, particularly in Peoria. Canada's Hiram Walker company opened a distillery in Peoria in 1934 and made whiskey there until 1981, when they sold the distillery to Archer Daniels Midland which converted it into an ethanol distillery.
and milestones which mark and imprint our lives.
Zach’s moms, Jackie and Terry must be exceedingly proud of their son. It is also nice to know that should Zach, and whoever his future wife should be, have a gay child, that child will be loved and celebrated.
Most of my runs during the week have been 3-5 miles. And, if we’re being honest, the majority of them as of late have been closer to 3. No real reason. No excuses. That’s just the way it’s gone down as of late.
MoneyTips – Ideas for getting ahead and staying ahead.
Today I forgot to change the alarm time from 0600 to 0700 so again Giel Beelen woke me up but this time an hour too early. In my rush of getting up I discovered the fault after 10 minutes. I already brushed my teeth but decided to go back to bed for another half hour rest.
Things have been pretty quiet at the Red Hen Home lately (that’s not a bad thing). It’s still too cold here to do any big furniture painting, so I’ve been keeping busy with a few signs!
I can't believe it is day 37. I never thought I would say that. I am 92.5% of the way through my juice feast! I can see the light at the end of the tunnel. Or maybe the glass at the bottom of the Ball jar is more accurate! Thanks for sticking with me through all the "stuff" I've been working through. Tomorrow, we party and celebrate the juiciness of life, love, and friendship. Rawsome!
As noted in Elizabeth's recipe text, this crust can stand up to a lot of toppings, and that was certainly true as our slices buckled but didn't break under all that cheesy goodness. The crust didn't get as CRISPY as I would have liked, even baking the pizza on a heated pizza stone, so I think next time I will divide the dough in half and make two thinner, smaller pizzas. I love the ease of this recipe for busy weeknight dining, though. You can't beat slapping some pizza dough together and baking it up what my grandpa used to call a "Hot Pie", within 45 minutes.
Swedish name: veteaxsöm?
Thanks to Erica for use of the condo and access to her fully stocked pantry. I especially appreciated the six packs of St. Arnolds and New Belgium beers she got for me – those beers made the two afternoon naps even more pleasurable.
Though there are undoubtedly many ways to interpret this elliptical, metaphorical journey - on a personal and societal level - for me the most compelling reading (at least that I've thought of) frames it as a tale about the nature of viewer complicity. The magician ceases to exist after she first enters the seedy world of the sauna-brothel: has the innocence (and audience engagement) that requires magic to work left her at this point? Likewise aren't we all complicit in the morally questionable practise of keeping of exotic animals in captivity, subsidising this industry whenever we visit a zoo? I know I'm guilty of this.
porque siempre voy 'callao':
However, since last Wednesday, my rock star status has been downgraded to white rapper.
Keith swallowed with a dry click. “Bill I— this is a lot of information to process. I’ve got work in the morning and I told Lisa I’d be—”
I saw the trailer for this once about a month ago in theaters. It was long and dull. I honestly can't bring myself to watch it again to refresh my memory. The basic story is this: Lincoln gets shot and everyone connected to the killer is put on trial. This includes a woman (Wright, I believe). McAvoy plays a lawyer (not sure for which side) who is distressed at having a woman barely connected to the plot being persecuted. I'm of mixed emotions about this movie. I don't want to go see it because the trailer was so yawn-worthy, but I'm interested because I believe James McAvoy to be a very talented actor. I think he could possibly make it onto my Legends List (Heath Ledger, Christian Bale, and Meryl Streep are all on it, just to name a few). I probably won't go see this one in theaters. $9 is a lot to pay to see something you don't really want to see in the first place. If you want to view the trailer for yourself, it's on imdb.com under the title page. My guess: 3 out of 5
In the Indian tradition there’s a term for events that make an impression: karma. Literally the word means “action” in Sanskrit, but karmas are actions that change us, for good or ill, by leaving a memory that causes action to change in the future. For the moment we won’t talk about the Law of Karma, which says that actions are balanced in the cosmos between good and evil, or as the New Testament states it, “as you sow so shall you reap.” Here, I’m only concerned with the stressful side of karma, by which certain life events make a deep impression while others don’t.
Davis, N. E. (2011) Online and blended learning rolling into New Zealand schools. Computers in New Zealand Schools: Learning, Teaching, Technology, 23(1). Retrieved from http://education2x.otago.ac.nz/cinzs/mod/resource/view.php?id=139
That last bit suggests either that the story’s wrong or that Christie’s a doofus since the deadline to get on the ballot in Florida is October 31. Anyway: Explain to me again why he’d supposedly be such a gangbusters candidate in the primary. He is, to be sure, a supremely gifted messenger on entitlements and public-employee unions, and he’s already accomplished something significant vis-a-vis the latter. Beyond that, what’s the argument for his candidacy? He’s been governor for just two and a half years, he believes in global warming, he’s questionable on guns, he seems to support comprehensive immigration reform, he backed Castle over O’Donnell (RINO!), etc. That’s not to say he can’t win — if we were willing to nominate McCain, we could nominate Christie — but I’m not sure why anyone thinks he’d necessarily settle far north of, say, 25 percent. He’d be dynamite at the debates, but the debates don’t matter much except to hardcore political junkies like you and me. Why risk running now and flaming out instead of staying put as governor, building a record, and then steamrolling into the 2016 primaries when he wouldn’t have to face a Democratic incumbent in the general?
Because I grew up with some of the greatest storytellers
For a visceral understanding of the issues at stake, meditate on two questions: what would Toronto (and Markham) be like if we hadn't built the Don Valley Parkway? What would Toronto be like if the Spadina Expressway hadn't been stopped? Look deeper into the Spadina question. Look beyond the fact that Forest Hill, the Annex and Chinatown would have been blasted to smithereens. Apply the aphorism "to the victor, the spoils."
What is BookAnd?
I haven't blogged in a long time. Boy...do I have a lot to say.
Anyway, Travis fans can get a taste for what life is like on tour with Randy and his band with “Cooking Memories On the Road,” a cookbook written by Randy and Elizabeth Travis. The book will be available on hsn.com and feature tidbits and personal photos from Travis’ numerous tours, as well as more than 100 recipes the country star gathered during his travels.
Every war movie has their fans and their enemies. I love my war movies and always will, but some people are against any type of war.
Dying for lack of air
Oregon Trail may be a robust little brewery that makes wonderful beers. My sample size is too small to comment. But if so, this is an anamoly: call it a gentleman's C.
Machine Gun
They're so easy, especially if you have the caramel already made, and although cheesecake isn't a favorite, these were otherworldly due to the salted caramel swirl, in spite of being a tiny bit overdone. Next time, I'll probably use my own caramel recipe (you can find my caramel 101 here) and add flour de del to it.
21st May 2012
that fire can seal the hurt within me.
To avoid everything we have learned falling out of his head without taking away his summer fun at centro estivo I'm making flashcards so we can have daily reviews that keep things fresh without taking up loads of time.
And there’s that other stupid song.
The church in many places is taking its cue from the entertainment world when it comes to how a congregation responds to truth during worship. If we like something, we applaud. The preacher makes a good point and we applaud. The musicians sing an exciting piece. We applaud. The biblical “Amen!” seems to have lost its place.
This topic makes my heart beat a little faster. I mean, my boys are toddlers; it scares me to have to think about their purity. But, if we don’t, someone else will. A statistic Brooke gave us in the Leader’s Guide is the average age of porn exposure is 11 years old (pg 18 LG).
I have seen someone (who shall be nameless, but is also known as Ms Sand and Sunshine!) wondering if anyone knows yet what the finished quilt is going to look like. Well yes, there is someone - ME! You never know, perhaps I can be bribed? It's worth a try isn't it?
So, with that I won't keep you waiting any longer...here was the before:
It was hard, people knowing. I remember visiting my in-laws and my FIL being really nice to me. No smart alec jokes, no stabs at me, and I remember thinking 'please just make a crack about my hair, my shoes... anything!!!' This is the man who called me Fatso when I was pregnant*. He never misses an opportunity and yet he was silenced.
Kenneth and Kayla would be dead.
Check out 71 Irving, Joe's, Gimme Coffee & 88 Orchard
I came across this today during my weekly blog catch-up. I was reading Chandres's post in Upcycled Purpose. If you haven't been to this blog, you need to go there and read what God's amazing grace and redemptive powers are doing in this family right now. PTL!
This was met by a loud round of applause.
We were planning to watch the late parade, so Devon and the girls waited on the sidewalk while I stood in line at the bakery-it was LONG! After waiting in line for about thirty minutes I discovered they were out of blueberry muffins:-(, but they still had lots of other goodies. I got a cinnamon roll, a chocolate chocolate chip muffin and a chocolate chip scone. When I went back out to Devon and the girls on the sidewalk I discovered this:
Director, Human Resources
Asked if he is going to Paris to testify in the Scorpene case, Najib snapped: “I don’t need to comment….I don’t want to comment, thank you.”
cyng1 at me dot com
Tooth And Claw
The seeds of temptation singing
The hubby and I are really big on growing our garden organicly. We don't want us or our children eating any nasty pesticides or chemicals. I recently discovered Whitney Farms® which has a full line of 100% organic plant food and organic soil with no additives, nothing artificial, just ingredients from the Earth, designed to give you big, beautiful flowers and veggies. Get the goodness of gardening naturally, with Whitney Farms® plant foods and soils.
There even still exists the enslavement of entire families. The International Labour Organization estimated in 2011 there were nearly 6,000 families who live and work in the brick kilns in Chengalpattu area of Kanchipuram, India. Kiln owners hire and indenture entire families, who can only find work by taking out high-interest loans to pay off debt or for housing and food when they move into the modern-day equivalent of “company towns.”
The kingdom was rebuilt and things went back to normal. The mean twin grew up. She was a teenager now, and she grew to become brattier and meaner. She resented her parents for loving her twin even if the kind twin was long dead. One day, the kind twin appeared in tattered clothes. She said the witch had held her captive all these years. She finally escaped. Everyone was overjoyed except the mean twin. They all thought the kind twin died in the fire, but they were always hoping that she could still be alive.
Celery*
Do not offer unnecessary information: If it isn’t relevant to your book or article’s topic, I don’t need to know it. Unnecessary information can include where you live, all the places you have lived, how many children you have, your marital status, why you haven’t published anything yet, anything personal like your divorce, how long you have been writing, your religious affiliation, and on and on and on. I don’t need you to tell me about where you live-I can get that from the return address on the envelope. If you’re writing a fantasy novel, I don’t need to know about your children, your divorce, or what religion you are. If you are writing an article about religion, it might be relevant to tell me about your religion, but that is not necessarily always the case. If you are writing a children’s book, telling me about your children and how they love your book is not going to convince me-of course your children love Mommy’s book.
I've been madly busy in the last few days, but I wanted to just drop a quick note about class. Thanks to the amazing help of you all, most especially the anonymous donor of $2500, I am able at last to study as close to full time at the studio as my work commitments will allow. I can't tell you how grateful I am for this help. I know I go on and on about it, but it really is making all the difference in the world.
SCARFACE CLAW
I remember as a 12 or 13 year old, deciding that with my extra ethnicities came responsibility. I deemed the chameleon my personal mascot, because I too would blend in no matter what kind of diverse people surrounded me.
In a little while I'm gonna whip up Bloody Mary's, ice cold and freckled with black pepper and then on the little splintered deck, I'm going to the Tiki Bar...the tinny sound of Rolling Stones dribbling from the little amfm radio will fill the Air....Amps the size of Winnebagos will hang from the sky, and for a little while, there won't be anything at all but the music and the movement and the moment.
FamilySecurityMatters.org
Pea, Leek and Prosciutto Risotto--you know the drill. Photos and recipe to follow!
Me: "My accent?" (sounding really confused....Do I REALLY sound that Texan & country??)
Opposing you Sun barely hung,
1 Glass of Extra Virgin Olive Oil (preferably made from Taggiasca olives too)
LJ Fort: Yes sir, pretty big family with four kids and they all ran track, went to state and my mom also went to state in high school too for track. I was the oldest of the kids so I didn’t really compete with any of them specifically but there was always competition within my family growing up.
New Beginnings reportedly couldn't and didn't perfom the court functions being privatized, instead constructing what seems from a distance almost a surreal Potemkin Village where company officials would bamboozle kids and their families: "as a private company, New Beginnings did not have the authority to impose legal sanctions on truancy offenders.," wrote Torres. "The company instead would hold mock court hearings before students reached the stage that a real court appearance was necessary. It was a program that one district administrator called 'a bluff factor.'"
* California Division of Communicable Disease Control * California Division of Engineering * California Division of Environmental and Occupational Disease Control * California Division of Gambling Control
It says my sweet dog
Warning: one use of the f-word follows because the sentence just didn't convey what I was going for without it.
2000 players minus 925 players who were called offside
Manage corrective actions and Non Conformance Record (NCR) for assuring engineering documents, engineering requisitions, and product conform to quality assurance/control requirements.
“Fill four water pots with water, and pour it on the burnt sacrifice and on the wood.” 34 Then he said, “Do it a second time,” and they did it a second time; and he said, “Do it a third time,” and they did it a third time. 35 So the water ran all around the altar; and he also filled the trench with water.
My love for Mad Men could go on for days, but the episode last night? Stunning. Titled "The Suitcase," it went deep into the relationship of my two personal favorite characters, Don and Peggy.
If anyone has any SPx insert cards from the six sets I'm collecting, let me know. I'd love to get these collections jump started with a few trades. You can look at my want lists and trade album by clicking here. There are a few jersey and auto'd football, baseball and basketball cards in there now. I'm always open to trades with fellow bloggers as well as anyone who is a member of Collectors Card World and Sports Card Forum. Thanks for reading and… "Enjoy Every Bounce of the Ball".
two of her heroes, the dancer and mime Lindsay Kemp (with
My camera batteries pooped out after I took this.
Maybe I should just hit that DVD sale!
Things are easier said than done. I need a reminder.
Has promised redemption
978-0-385-66070-9, 448 pp.,
Price: $7.50
He is tall, good looking, intelligent and incredibly sexy.
So it was that I discovered while reading this collection that Linda Chase had endured the same type of death as O’Faolain, from cancer. It is a hard thing for the living to write about the largest elephant in any room, death, because we normally never see it coming from the close range that Sorescu, O’Faolain and Chase have. I am honoured to have known Linda Chase through her work. I only wish I had known her in life.
And then there's one of the main characters in the "Born to Run" book...Scott Jurek, arguably one of the best ultrarunners in the world...and he's a heel striker! Scott excels at both trail AND pavement ultramarathons. He helped with the design of his shoe of choice (the Cascadia), which is a "substantial," and fairly heavy and cushy shoe, by any means of measurement.
Here is what I have learned: people do not change. The most “enlightened” sounding people can be the most disturbed and do not know themselves at all; they need professional help. As much as we are all in this together with our friends, family, neighbors, ultimately, we are alone. We are born alone and we will die alone. The most important thing to have is strength in yourself. We all need that wisdom and courage it takes to go to bed and wake up the next day knowing that even though it is hard to put one foot in front of the other, we have no choice but to continue. That even in uncharted territory we must force ourselves to go on and that family is not necessarily defined by blood lines but by goodwill, caring, kind, well-intentioned, love. Pure and simple. Love should not be that complicated, and if it always is, there is something very, very wrong.
Food & Music: TBA
Grab your ticket and your suitcase, thunder’s rolling down this track
One of the best things we did was take the St. Charles Ave
I had no idea in the state we were in
Doin' Japo Wrong!
and put down z.
This was to be the final Rockin' Vickers single and it was produced by the legendary Shel Talmy (Who, Kinks etc). Their connection with Talmy gave them access, presumably to some Ray Davie's tracks (there's an unreleased Ray Davie's number they cut in '66 called "Little Rosie" that was contained on their CD compilation). "Dandy" was never released as a single by The Kinks and sadly The Vickers release in the U.K. of it as an "A" side in November 1966 had been preceeded a month earlier by a dreadful version by a square as hell looking and sounding gent named Clinton Ford (Pye 7N 35343), neither version charted though Herman's Hermits took it to #5 in the U.S. charts in September 1966 (without a U.K. release)!
“My family is in Florida and I’m in New York?!”
Near-Death Visitations
"This one is from me to you!"
It is easy to extend the above analysis to events. We speak of events such as my striking the golf ball and the golf ball flying through the air, but is this differentiation in fact anything other than convenient? Surely it would be just as correct (though perhaps less convenient) to speak of a single process of motion which was at first exhibited by the golf club and later in the golf ball. Pursuing the point even further, what is necessary about the categories of striking and flying ? It would be just as correct (though less useful) to say: 'There was an event of physical objects in motion.' We cut up the happening going on around us in non-necessary ways. We could cut up our club-ball happening into the downward motion of the object and the upward motion of the object. If we did this we would say that the downward motion of the object plus some other centripetal vector X caused the upward motion of the object. It might be of no interest that in the upward motion the object (as attended to) was first the club and then the ball.
Martin received his early education at Magdeburg and Eisenach, before enrolling at the University of Erfurt at age 17. Red-shirted during his freshman season, he became an outstanding left tackle for the Fightin’ Furter football team by the time he graduated with a bachelor’s degree in 1502. He passed on an opportunity for a pro career — he was projected as high as the eighth round by some scouts — and chose to stay in school to pursue his master’s, which he received in 1505.
Once in my 20s, my roommate and I hired a cleaning lady for our New York City duplex (which sounds more luxurious than it really was). The cleaning lady lasted one day because my roommate cleaned up before she came, and I’m just too territorial to let a stranger into my stuff.
Like their forebears, the modernist intellectuals of the early twentieth century agonised over their relationship with the West. Some of them thought that Russia had to be ruthlessly rationalised and modernised, so that science and industry took the place of priests and the plough. Others, like the great Futurist poet Velimir Khlebnikov, insisted that the answers to Russia's many problems lay in the country's remote rural interior, with the folk stories and folk magic of peasants and nomads. After wandering deep into the woodlands and marshes of the east and also exploring dictionaries of various medieval Slavic tongues, Khlebnikov developed a dialect of his own called 'Zaum', which he thought capable not only of describing but also magically altering reality, after the manner of the imps and goblins which inhabit Russian mythology.
Uh huh.
Calendars : Glitz Design, Country Estate by Webster's Pages
Repeat 3rd and 4th rows to 26 sts on needle.
I love animals, but I love myself more, and I would not put myself at risk to be vegan. So far, I have never had any diet-related health problems in my 10 years of vegetarianism and 6 or so years of pretty decently adherent veganism. I don't personally know any other vegans that have either. But I am willing to admit that it is possible and that if you are struggling big time, maybe you should try something else. Let's not torture people to beleaguer the point, vegans: if everybody ate less meat we would already be getting somewhere important, and forcing people to stick to a diet they don't like, or even makes them sick, is not our job.
dark burning delicious blue
Right now, we are just trying to keep up with the Corky Facebook page, Cat’s Cradle Facebook page, and Cat’s Cradle Twitter account. We are not going to get to do everything we wanted, but we are doing a lot of cool stuff.
Level 7: Weapon ATT: +7, Accuracy: +3%, Proc Rate: 49%, Deals 181% damage 2 times.
I think I'm quite lucky to have a pharmacist that speaks English at a pharmacy near my school. I can't even begin to imagine trying to act out or gesture medical symptoms to someone who speaks no English in hopes that they will be able to decipher my motions correctly and give me medicine that will actually help my ailment. Nevertheless, I'm always pretty apprehensive to take Korean medicines that I've picked up at the pharmacy or gotten at a doctor's office. More times than I can count, one of my co-workers has come back from the doctor's office with a Ziploc baggy of 40-50 unlabeled pills and instructions to take these pills together twice a day and these other 2 pills every third day or something like that. What boggles me even more is the fact that most of my co-workers begin popping these pills without a second thought about what they might be.
Devidutt does a fabulous job of jotting down the epic from start to finish. his research not only encompasses what happened after the war (the travel of pandavas to hell), but also describes the ancestors of the kuru clan in detail.
You should have seen the outfit I had picked out to wear today. So cute.
Jonsi: I'm not sure yet, but I think we'll want to take some strings with us, especially when we're playing the new album. It will be difficult to translate those songs live without them.
This kid has been on a gymnastics team since he was 5 years old. The story goes like this – he was the only one of my kids who was a climber. When we would bring the family to the playground on a Sunday morning, all the kids would either be on the swings or on the climbing structure, well except for Trevor, who would always be on top of any high structure.
Lately, we have seen national and local politicians hugging the limelight in all types of media mouthing their political plans, making political tie-ups and seeking political patronage.
Father’s Name: Dr. Ashok Chopra
Whose woods these are I think I know.
Paper Towel;
A few months ago, I encouraged whiskey fans to celebrate Clix Vodka because the overpriced vodka from Buffalo Trace will hopefully subsidize the price of our precious bourbons and ryes. But then I began to wonder how a vodka of this sort would taste.
In another recent review—of War Horse—I compared the pleasure of catching the show to receiving my first major literary award. That became my “fist award.” Now this might make sense if I were a pugilist or could put my fists to an unusual type of intercourse, but since neither applied, this fist caused me quite a fit.
I love with all my heart.
Hi to all my blog friends and followers..It seems so so long since I offered a freebie giveaway..lately I have been having great fun making prim furries bears and bunnies and with starting my new job I seem to have so much more energy for my prims which I do in my spare time and so would love to offer this great little prim *SPRINGTIME EASTER BUNNY* signed and dated as a giveaway..He is around 7" sitting and made from a grubby plush fabric.. I used a great pattern from my dear FB friend Sandy Holt to create him.. He is holding a prim beeswax chocolate scented egg and has a SRINGTIME tag around his neck.. This would greatly enhance any prim Easter decor.. DRAWN ON SUNDAY 25TH MARCH (the start of british summertime) open to everyone who cares to enter and to have a possible 4 entries complete the steps below:
'Tolson.' Bartleby enigmatic as ever. Mac screwed up his brain to squeeze out the connection.
I am on the bus home and I am tired, though not as tired as I had been. Four weeks on from a fortnight of doing fuck all in the French Alps and I am still feeling somewhat restored. There were three months of waking up feeling bleached and sedated prior to that. I don't know why.
ushered into and through the Ivy League despite unremarkable grades and
First up it’s my “Spooky Scary Skeletons” who give the family quite a fright, but then treat them to a poem and various jokes:
It's Easter Eve, and the faculty arrived today. I was warned that there were 'conditions', which turned out to be: That the Diocesan Advisory Committee should approve the final design of the flooring in the church (which they already have); and That if the stackable benches are not in use they should be put in a place where they are not obtrusive. All I will say about that is '!'
With the full knowledge that ANC government are a scheming bunch of liars, with absolutely no moral integrity whatsoever, I’m inclined to believe there’s more truth in the following report in the Telegraph, dated 23 August 2011:
*THEY CAME FROM WITHIN – Radio Spot
No, not the 1980s TV show. That’s just to increase my google hit. This post is really about dynastic politics that pervades Bangladesh. In fact, not just Bangladesh but many other similar (and not-too-similar) countries. Ask any Bangladeshi pundit (or not-so-pundit-but-bhadralok-type) and you’ll hear the evils of dynastic politics. Many a people in (not to mention supporting) the 1/11 regime were sincere in their desire to improve matters by eliminating the key dynasties from politics.
In past few months, the push towards the cloud has ramped up. All the major IT players have modified, improved or rolled out what can be loosely called cloud solutions. Microsoft released the second iteration of its BPOS solution, now re-branded Office365. Amazon has tweaked it Elastic Compute Cloud (EC2) solution, allowing free inbound data. Apple released the iCloud for data backup. Google continue to develop its Google Docs offering. Even the likes of HP, Fujitsu, EMC and Cisco have gotten into the cloud game. The belief that Cloud is the next generation platform for businesses and end users alike is unwavering and gathering momentum.
How did you find the writing process?
i am a very happy girl, indeed.
Kerryn Phelps, AM, was the first female president of the Australian Medical Association (AMA) where she fought for many public health and social issues. Known through her work as a health journalist, she and her wife Jackie Stricker-Phelps have worked for legal equality for same-sex relationships since their marriage in New York in 1998. Prof. Phelps was honoured in the 2011 Queens Birthday honours list, being made Member of the Order of Australia for ‘service to medicine, particularly through leadership roles with the Australian Medical Association, to education and community health, and as a general practitioner’.
I kept it fairly simple with lots of white space but the sentiment (which is Stampin Up's Happy Everything) seemed so perfect for a graduation. The mouse is House Mouse's Oh! Happy Days and I thought it was also very fitting for the occasion. Now I'm not partial to mice at all but these little House Mouse characters are the sweetest and it's all good because they are not real! The image was coloured with copics and a bit of Antique Linen distress ink rubbed around the edges for shading. I used a Provocraft border to emboss the top and bottom, scored some lines and then added some little flatback embellishments and a bit of ribbon. Easy Schmeasy!
6. Barons Of Filth
At this stage I would just thank them for the well wishes and don’t mention the wedding at all. Since you don’t know any of the details yourself you don’t want to blurt out, “Thanks, but you’re not invited.”
Know that It is being done unto you ; All by Itself.
After several months of being married, having traveled down to his home town in Mexico several times, we began to feel the pull to move there. We talked to the kids, fasted and prayed, and received confirmation that that was what we were to do. We started the construction of our home soon thereafter, as per THESE posts, then several months later I gave birth to our first child together, my first and only flax-haired little boy. We moved to Mexico a year later, expecting another baby by this time, and moved into the tiny mother-in-law's quarters of our unfinished home, a space that was designed for two. We were eight, as our oldest had already left for college.
I'll make the cake next, after I get the eggs.
A final warning:
5: They occur when the Sun is at 26 Sagittarius, 22 Pisces, 18 Gemini and 14 Virgo.
John Bremond, Sr. died in 1866 in Buffalo, New York, while on a business trip. His interests were taken over by his sons Eugene and John, Jr.
Star, Feb 23/12
Choice B: Continue to lose the battle over jeans vs me.
Second, I'm amazed at how the media world continues to ignore this story.
When they come, we must be ready.
A burning building and unbearable heat. We face no option but retreat.
kaz...i really wanted to do tone on tone horizontal stripes in the en-suite, but i was outvoted! i do like the final choice better, i must admit.
Although I used to keep a gratitude journal, I've fallen behind on it. And even though things have been rough around here lately, when I stop and think, I'm thankful for so much.
You better believe it!
To bring their supreme, detailed and laborious calculations into modern context, it is synchronous that in 2012, there will be two profound solar eclipses and a rare ‘transit of Venus’ on June 6th, when Venus will pass directly in front of the Sun from our Earth perspective. It forms a perfect alignment of Earth, Venus and Sun. Transits come in 8-year pairs, with the precursor to this transit seen in June 2004. Transits of Venus happen on average only twice every 121 years. The last transit of Venus occurred in 1874 and 1882, around the time of rediscovery of ancient Mayan sacred sites. The 2012 Venus transit completes the pair and the phenomenon will not recur until 2117 and 2125.
Additionally, as far as I'm concerned, if you're writing a review, no one reading it gives a shit about your personal life, good, bad, ugly, whatever. Okay, be fair, the first review one writes after, say, the birth of their child or another major life event? Yes, by all means, have it in all caps for Heaven's sake. In any other case, though, shut the Hell up.
How solemn the thought of my whispering soul to each in the ranks,
Helen McCloy/Mystery Writers of America Scholarship for Mystery Writing (http://www.mysterywriters.org/?q=AwardsPrograms-McCloy). This organization seeks to nurture talent and professional development in mystery fiction, nonfiction, playwriting, and screenwriting.
Thelonious Monk - Thelonious Monk Trio - 1952
The answer to the last question is no. This isn’t a visual story, so the slideshow format is ill-suited to the news. In other words, there’s nothing to see here.
For Victor did not die as recorded in Shelly’s novel, and used his own version of transplant surgery to remain vital and young. Over hundreds of years he perfected his techniques and was able to create perfect duplicates of living people, replacing them with his New People, creatures which would obey his every command and work with him to eliminate all the Old People from the planet.
and the reason is you
When you ask the Universe/God for something, you have to be WILLING to receive it in a form that looks different from what you’ve imagined. Your UNWILLINGNESS to be flexible ties the hands of the Universe/God and then you get what you don’t want.
I had forgotten about this question until Piers Fletcher reminded me in the comments section. It turns out that some human populations do have surprisingly good underwater vision; notably, several groups of seagoing nomads in Southeast Asia (usually called “sea-gypsies”, which seems almost definitely politically incorrect). Researchers have compared the underwater spatial resolution of children from some of these tribes to that of European children, and the sea-children fare over twice as well.
Mt. 16:19 17 Jesus replied, “Blessed are you, Simon son of Jonah, for this was not revealed to you by flesh and blood, but by my Father in heaven. 18 And I tell you that you are Peter, and on this rock I will build my church, and the gates of Hades will not overcome it. 19 I will give you the keys of the kingdom of heaven; whatever you bind on earth will be bound in heaven, and whatever you loose on earth will be loosed in heaven.”
Until today, I thought the Lost Pines were centered on Bastrop State Park, but I was miles southwest of the park when I came upon more pine trees where they just shouldn't be. I guess it's the southwestern most edge of those in Bastrop, but mixed in with more post oaks and cedars.
“Nobody wants to drink pee,” said the head of the city’s water bureau.
The products are being sold under the trademark “Sheri Lynn Designs,” a variation on my former “Sheri Berry” and current “Sheri McCulley” brands that Gakken felt would work best in their primary market.
Another workaround suggested has been set a lap fast lap on an aggressive strategy, pit, then change maps and run a lap on the race strategy. But the FIA are already beating this trick in two ways. Firstly the same map must be from used Q1, therefore all qualifying laps will have to be made with the same mapping as for the race start. This will further add to the deterrent of teams using aggressive maps, as this accounts for several extra laps in Q, as well as the first stint. This will be hard on the engines life and the fuel consumption. Secondly just as with tyres, it’s the set up on which the cars fastest lap is set that becomes the set up to start the race. It seems there are few workarounds to the rules.
The effects of District 9 were grittier and more realistic, and they demonstrated the quality that could be accomplished without a Cameron-sized budget. It’s not like the aliens only appeared in shadows, and it’s not like the aliens and humans never interact. You also can’t tell me that the cost was because the horizon needed to be generated, because District 9 has a dirty, great, big spaceship in the horizon for most shots!
2. Given past history I’d guess that it will end up on the satellite providers in reasonably short order.
Here’s where it gets tricky. You can improve aerobic fitness through high intensity exercise like sprinting. Sprinting can also increase strength and stimulate the release of growth hormone, two things that aerobic exercise will not do. Since we’re no longer talking about an athletic population, we can use a little more freedom when it comes to managing the total intensity and stress of the training. As a result, I’m still a little bit more in favor of high intensity training vs. aerobic training for this population.
Apparently, police have just found the Gallardo in a 17 year old’s storage unit. They found it as they investigated a shooting the 17 year old is suspected of, which was done while the kid was riding a motorcycle. You couldn’t make this stuff up.
I hope that I can stay motivated and I hope that this work out gets easier!
My point, goddammit, is that they aren’t enlightened, and presenting them this way is a real disservice not just to history or culture but to the whole notion of stories. In the Pagan tradition, gods are supposed to be flawed. Their flaws explain the problems with the universe. Their flaws explain evil, suffering and pain. It’s the most appealing thing about polytheism; there’s some other god out there causing your hardship. You don’t understand them and you can’t.
We attacked the archway again, fighting the surge. Once we were directly under the gap we went up a gear, Aaron pushing us from the rocks while I steered and provided forward thrust. We emerged at the other side like a broken dragon, coughing and spluttering against the force of the water. I was knackered, but we did it and we’re elated that it hadn’t beaten us.
I don't always use my sketchbooks, except the one my talented bookmaker daughter made for me.
Sedums
It blew off, to the ground
2 studies
Here are my favorite non-retouched photos from the Nelson shoot today, give feedback, I love to hear it!
I went to bed immediately after Mass Saturday night and probably fell asleep before 9:30. I slept soundly until about 2:30am when I got up to go to the bathroom and noticed it was pouring rain. I wanted to get up early and get back to Killarney in time for breakfast, so this was bad news. I got up again at about 6:30am, noticed it was only drizzling, and hit the road by about 6:45.
People are called to serve one another in love. Serving brings life to others and self-transformation. The church is at its best when it serves, sacrifices, and loves others. Jesus had an uncanny ability to meet people exactly where they were and yet draw them into a life renewed. Sharing faith, love, and hope with others should be a natural part of life. We are committed to service, compassion, outreach, and alleviating spiritual, physical, social, and emotional poverty.
About the accident, I mentioned -- I was walking down a darkened hallway and suddenly heard a squall that triggered shivers down my spine and sent me leaping -- pretty good jumping for this gal. Rushing into the lighted room was furry black Randall who I had unwittingly stepped on. I felt sick in the pit of my stomach wondering which of his body parts or how seriously he had been harmed. Randall made a hasty retreat to the top carpeted tree perch from which he looks down on all of us. His master quickly moved to comfort him as I soon followed, cautiously, slowly, extending my open hand. Randall's piercing dark eyes looked into mine as I offered soft soothing apologies. I was allowed to slightly caress a leg but faint signs of hair rising on his back admonished me to not persist.
The soundtrack was delivered to me on CD. Every reel had its own sound file. The TiffanyTone disks had been digitally transferred for us by UCLA. No filtering or processing had been made to the audio, it came straight off the original disks. I'm not sure about the pre-equalization on TiffanyTone disks so I decided not to apply anything out of the blue. The sound is rather shrill and noisy. I have good experience in restoring 78's but the soundtrack disks seems to be a bit different, and they should be. I did however apply a slight pop-filter to eliminate the most apparent pops and crackles. I also lowered the over all noise level with about 6dB to make the dialogue stand out, but that's all.
So Castle is apparently tapping into my brain while I sleep and basing their episodes on all my not-so-secret fears. Or somebody there is reading my blog! How cool would that be??? Whoever it is, tell Nathan I said, “Captain.” He’ll know what I mean.
We like to cook Thai and Chinese food. So tonight we fixed crispy fried eggplant and Hunan tofu. Delicious! We eat two meals a day with a light snack in the afternoon. It is all we need. I'm glad that both of us are on the same page with food--no salt, no meat except seafood, almost no processed food, lots of vegetables. We had arguments for years about food. I was the no salt, no carbs, no meat person and my wife was the meat, salt and pasta person. After her heart attack, things drastically changed in terms of her eating habits. No more arguments about food or booze. What a nice change that is!
I made these for the SCS Hope You Can Cling To challenges. These cards will get packaged up along with any others I can make this week and sent to MD Anderson for visitors to give to patients.
Physical activity produces many positive physiological changes. Some of these physiological changes, however, can adversely affect the performance (absorption, distribution, metabolism, and/or excretion) of certain medications when taken concurrently. The liver and the kidney play significant roles in calculating the absorption parameters of medications. Blood flow to these organs is significant at rest but decreases during exercise. These changes in blood flow, as well as other physiological changes during exercise, have shown to alter the actions of some drugs. Medications that require extra therapeutic monitoring may be affected by this drug-exercise interaction.
Indeed it is easy to notice that the greatest population of people who belong in the upper classes of the society make it a point to be always in vogue from the clothes they wear down to the least prominent accessories they have. However, you would also find it obvious that even those who belong in the middle class are becoming insistent to work on their way just to keep up with the latest in fashion. Because of this present situation, luxury watches like ladies diamond watches from different brands are well appreciated and typically sought after by people from all walks of life.
Then I found these two in the salesbin:
My particular assembly is The Gathering Community Church. In this group, evangelism and saving the lost is a high priority and frequent conversation topic. This group wants to reach the world so that they can be saved. Saved from what? the heathens would ask. Well sin, obviously, the good Christian would answer. And that question has been done to death already. What I’m asking myself and anyone who’s willing to ask with me is, What are these heathens being saved into? By joining up with the organized church, and presumably the Christian faith tradition, what is actually changed for the eager new convert? What is better about her life than the day before, the week before, the year before?
Anyway, tomorrow I will upload my latest video, “Harry Reid Porn” – as usual, it did not come out as good as I hoped, but perhaps some people will get a kick out of it!
cos we’re sitting on riches beyond our dreams
And then I saw it:
Explore and have fun because you never know what your creativity can bring you.
His heart was thumping in his chest as he took the stairs three at a time.
I did some house cleaning and then g-son and I headed outside to play. We played red light/ green light, balance beam and I pushed him in the swing until Pawpaw got home from work. We even played a game to see who could make the funniest face.
People have been coming and going from Shetland Girl's flat that is up for sale, you can hear them go up the stairs.
And in turn I started to know what he needed. I changed what I was doing as best as I could to please him. Not because he wanted me too, but because I wanted to. I wanted to be better for him. I wanted to be a better person for him. I wanted him to know that no matter what he had someone in his corner that was always cheering him on, that always was on his side and that I would be there through the hard time as well as the good.
That is all. Carry on.
Until the 20th century we did not see the consolidation of media into large conglomerates, and of course, there were no mass radio or TV until mid-20th century. Not until later in the century did we see the monopolization of local media markets by a single newspaper (competitors going belly-up) which, then, had to serve everyone, so it had to invent the fake "objective" HeSaidSheSaid timid style of reporting in order not to lose customers of various ideological stripes and thus lose advertising revenue. Conflating objectivity with "he-said-she-said" journalism (the term is Jay Rosen's) is a bit of a stretch, but Zivkovic attempts to explain what has happened.
Ed Berliner over at Sports Media Masters reminded me of this gem I heard over the weekend from ace FOX Sports baseball analyst Tim McCarver:
"The National Executive Committee of UKIP decided in January to include the BFPO amongst a list of proscribed organisations whose members, and former members are not welcome in UKIP."
She had some issues with bullying (she the victim) which has been happening for some time, and I was showing the perpetrator some grace while she received counselling for this bullying. On day two of the school year Mop was down, quiet and withdrawn because she had been bullied again by this child. This Mama had had enough! So I went down and sorted it out with the teacher. This bully got dealt with quite quickly and firmly which is great, and Mop has regained confidence and her enthusiasm for school and friends.
As off through the waves they roll
all that might tarnish the sanctity of Priests,
Standing in the cold hospital room I watched as my grandmother’s heartbeat slowed down little by little. The numbers on the beeping monitor decreased and the spiking line declined slowly. The clock ticked in the distant abyss of the room and I longed desperately for the ticking to stop, for time to stop, rewind even. I shivered, standing next to her, holding her hand. As the numbers continued to fall, my heart raced and I wondered what I would do when she was gone. I knew she was going to die, but sometimes you live in a small window of hope without realizing it, and my heart had been left there, believing she would somehow get better. Who would save me now?
Dehydration of investment occurs in a double step process. Let’s start the cast investment at room temperature. The first form of gypsum is plaster – calcium sulfate dihydrate: CaSO4 + 2 H2O.
They suggest:
But it all goes much deeper than the argument with my colleague. My terrible bouts of rage that have cropped up in the past, also triggered by this person in this situation, have their roots in my childhood and anger towards my parents. The colleague pushed the big red button, the doorway to my past traumas with them, exposing the red-raw nerve and unexpressed, repressed anger.
I had initially attempted to use the video component of the iPad 2 to make audio recordings of students reciting poems for two voices. (From Messing Around on the Monkey Bars and Other School Poems for Two Voices by Betsy Franco.) I was not impressed with the audio – in fact, the audio was so sensitive it picked up all sorts of extraneous noise in a busy classroom environment and made the recording less crisp and clear. As a result of this semi-failed attempt, I sought out Garage Band – and things have been dreamy ever since! The quality of voice recording – which is all we have used so far – is terrific.
Give them traditions they can pass down to their own children...
I think I like what Obama said about his passing best...
Wombat Girl was keen. Video Boy not so much (surprise!). We visited my Mum to scam craft supplies that I didn't have (beading needle, embroidery cotton etc). I visited Spotlight to pick up felt and beads. And we were set.
One day, my friend and I were playing on it when about 6 kids, led by Bob (my first bully that I can name) approached us. They ignored my friend and surrounded me on the deck. I still recall how the hairs on the back of my neck stood up and my pulse started racing. It’s an easy feeling to recall, because decades later, when I had my first panic attack at age 21, it felt the same and this incident vividly came back to me (more on this later).
dwindling local apple supply.
Here is the Recipe (Yields Two Servings):
another background paper
give me open hands and open doors
As reported by Houston Craft Beer Examiner Brian Carey, Fort Bend Brewing is to be a retooled effort of Jeff King, Ray Self and the former Kreuz Creek Brewing, a craft brewery start-up that failed to materialize as planned in 2011 for undisclosed reasons. The new brewery is to be located in the Sugar Land area and should package beer in kegs, bottles and cans as early as April.
I placed my hand on his cheek, wished him luck in his medal game (in 4 hours!) and walked away.
In the form of a religious nest.
Don’t give up. And don’t keep gnawing over one book if you can’t sell it; put it aside and start another. And another. A publisher who takes you on is going to want more than one book out of you, so there’s no harm in practising! The other important thing is to know how and when to take advice about your writing. If you’re hearing an opinion that rings even vaguely true with you, or if it comes from more than one source, there’s a good chance it’s sound. Be willing to adapt and change things and realise it doesn’t necessarily mean compromising your story.
eight dead and several
I corner in, this night that densely nights
2. After leaving school I worked for an engineering firm making conveyor belts for the mining industry. What I mean is, I was a secretary there. I wasn't hands-on with tangential chain rollers and integrated pneumatics. My first task was to type out a tender for a million pound contract with British Coal. I only had Stage One RSA in shorthand and typing and it took me half the afternoon. The company didn't get the contract and later went bust. I've definitely used this experience more than once in a short story.
I love it that I am free to be a Muslim without anyone ever staring at me with hate since I am a Muslim. I love it that I am not considered enemy of the state. I love it that when I go out in my hijab, the people out there recognize my modesty rather than thinking of it as some manifestation of terror spreading tendencies of mine. I love it that I am free to wear a niqab if I choose to wear one. I have not decided to wear one yet because I am not sure if I will be able to keep it up if I ever go back to the USA which might happen if my daughters (currently in high school and middle school) choose a college in the States. I do not want to be a hypocrite in the sense that I hide my face from the Arab men but not from the American men. My hijab does slowly keep on inching towards my forehead and my chin. But keeping the issue of niqab aside, I am free to dress modestly without having to feel apologetic for it.
Kodak Playsport Zx5 vs Kodak Zi8 – No Wrong Choice
This vignette was first posted to the soc.history.what-if newsgroup on 2 February 2002. (Was is just a coincidence that part 2 of "Victoria's Secret" was first posted on 02/02/02? You'll have to ask Jonathan.)
What would be different at each meal would be the addition of some of these: ham (often served), pork chops, and what she called “beef roast,” which would be braised in gravy.
I want ice water.
As the sad irony of that statement sunk in I scanned down the page and was shocked at what I saw. His second to last tweet pierced me as chills cascaded along my back. The message read:
For instance, we only want to look at something that is a source of joy, not at something likely to sadden us. If any one of the senses is missing, the entire dimension of that sense is lost. One who can’t hear is bereft of the whole arena of sound. Similarly, he who can’t see is deprived of all the beautiful sights and colours. So the sense is more important and much bigger than the object of the sense.
Pretty much as soon as we got out of the car, I saw people in costume! I got so excited, I started skipping. It felt like time has gone back to my first encounter with japanese animes and other animations! It was like a dream come true! I wish I’d have known about it beforehand, maybe I would have been in costume too. Oh well, there’s always next year.
Did Breivik get that line from Beck? Maybe, maybe not. But if he did, I bet he got it indirectly, via his pal Geller.
Blue as the sky, sunburnt and lonely,
An unashamed plug this week for Idea Transform, an event I’m helping organise between 20-22 April 2012 (so just a week’s time, depending on when you read this).
The Decades project II.
What did you learn...
Doing what IS right versus what FEELS right is sometimes a very difficult task. I am over my dramatic mood and have had a chance to talk to Idgie about our situation. Things between us got pretty complicated very fast. There are other people involved in our relationship and we do need to take time to evaluate what is important to us and to see if what we have is real outside of the little bubble that we have been in for the past seven months.
But I come back to tangibles and my mind jumps to jewelry that belonged to my mother. Crystal vases, glasses and china that belonged to my grandmothers.
290) waking up and knowing my mum is here and
My dad was born in Cambridge in the 50’s, growing up very close to David Gilmour and other members of Pink Floyd - he has always followed the Cambridge music scene very closely and has seen many of their influential concerts. He lived in London during the 70’s and early 80’s, experiencing the cataclysm of culture and music which living with certain people during that time became. He toured with The Clash, The Beat and Bob Marley, there might be more but these are the ones I know about.I selected a few shots of The Beat below (featuring candids of Dave Wakeling, Ranking Roger, Andy Cox, David Steele and Dave Blockhead) from Jackson’s Flickr set, but you can see the rest here. For those who are technically inclined, Jackson used an Olympus OM2 with a 24mm lens and Ilford HP5 film to capture these photos of the band backstage and performing live.
The movie ends with ‘splosions, twists and, for some reason, an ass kicking Dead Kennedys song. Lovelock stands up and starts rocking out all over the room. Starkwell wishes he had stayed asleep. I guess they will have to agree to disagree on this one.
how much appreciate your visits and comments.
This could be a sign that I need to slow down and take a break. OR NOT.
Other peoples stuff. Mine now. Who's later?
The buck jumped and bolted over the hill. It was a perfect shot. Almost immediately they heard the deer fall and begin to roll down the hill. His father grinned and clapped him on the back. Seth was breathing heavily, adrenaline pumping through his veins. Together, they walked over the hill and spotted the white underbelly of the buck’s body. His father began to say something when suddenly, he stopped. His smile faded and he gazed around at the trees, fear and worry contorting his lined face. Seth looked around as well, but he saw nothing except the breathtaking refractions of sunlight on frost-covered tree limbs. But there was something different. The woods had become silent. There was no wind, no birds chirping, no crows cawing and crying in the distance.
It's funny how when children ask questions of their parents they feign ignorance. We asked, as innocently as one might imagine, what the sores were on her arms. "Nothing." Her answer was an obvious lie, but we couldn't give a follow up before she grabbed us and drug us out to the little garden patch, and quickly cut some flowers. "Keep these in your pockets. It's nothing."
OK, I know I said that we would try to stay grounded throughout this entire process. Stay realistic. Keep our heads out of the clouds. We told ourselves that nobody makes it on their first try. But the truth?
Then, I threaded my yarn needle and wove the yarn
Of course George Lucas totally screwed with history and he is proud of it.
with our products and customer service is of the utmost importance. We go out of our way to make sure that your shopping experience is something that you remember and that the products you purchase from us are treasures you will love for a lifetime. Contact us with any questions or concerns that you have.
Yorkshire and Humberside had been seen as a secondary consideration and yet Andrew Brons got a higher vote than the Chairman. But Head Office was more concerned with getting money into seats where key officers were candidates, rather than looking at where the most votes were likely to come from! By this time we were into an annual income of something like £2 million and yet branches and groups had to give up money to finance the European elections. Head Office should have paid for it and left the branches and the groups to conserve their finances for local elections. The Party had lost the plot with its misjudged priority of pumping millions into the Northern Ireland office. It was if we were about to be a key player in government. And yet we hadn’t won over-all control of a single council- or even a parish.
It is HER fault.
If you do I guarantee you won’t share it “later”.
5. I had to change the title of a few of my posts. So….my dad once in awhile will read my blog to catch up on my life. He doesn’t have the link saved, but knows he can just google “julia c’est la vie blog” or something like that. Well, he did that the other day and the post that came up was, “I like it long.” Now, it was a totally innocent post about doing lots of “long” runs at a slower pace during base training. He, however, did not find the title too amusing. Haha….ooops. Even though I am 30 years old, I still totally look up to and respect my dad (he is after all, a West Point graduate Airborne Ranger), so I changed the title to something even stupider, but I suppose more appropriate like, “going the distance.”
“Forget designs upon my bum
Here is Hayden’s Collage:
When we landed, we drove right to my office, as I keep a spare pump there so I don’t have to schlep it back and forth every day. Once we got there, I could not figure out how to get in off hours – all the doors were locked and there was no security. (On Monday, I asked my boss and found out how, but it isn’t an obvious way.)
abundance, speak this truth over your life every day. The light will
Iâ€™ll tell the world itâ€™s because of youâ€¦â€¦â€¦â€¦
1/2 c Israeli couscous
179 ***1. “Psychiatry and the Law: An Old-Fashioned Approach.” Lawrence Z. Freedman, ed., By Reason of Insanity: Essays on Psychiatry and the Law (Wilmington, Delaware: Scholarly Resources, Inc., 1983), pp. 167-77. Quoted from at length, on nature, in Item B-4, above, pp. 414-17 (1983). (Source: Item D-X/12(B)/1979, below. Incorporated in Item B-5, above, pp. 407-21 (1992).)
K.
Cited among "private zoning applications to change the allowed uses and densities on their sites" are the former Domino Sugar Factory on the Brooklyn waterfront and the former Con Edison site on Manhattan’s east side. The rezoning of Greenpoint-Williamsburg is called "one of the biggest transformations of the city landscape since the rezoning of 1961."
Everyone is unique.
In the aftermath of the bruising November 2010 losses, Democrats clearly needed something “grassrootsy” to counter the still strong Tea Party. Enter Occupy Wall Street, whose first protest began Sept 17, 2011 in Zuccotti Park in Manhattan.
Thank you Cindy for making me smile by showing these ornaments so thoughtfully displayed!
I fear that some of the advice given in the recent Mothers Union report on the sexualisation of children may prompt parents into fighting a losing battle to prevent unsuitable Internet material being viewed by their offspring.
Don't ya just love Saturday mornings?
Not only was my sleeping schedule messed up, but so was my dining schedule. In these 20 days, I changed from a person who eats breakfast, lunch, and dinner quite regularly to someone who eats almost randomly one to three times a day, and not at set times. For example, as I mentioned last post, I ate only two meals total in three consecutive days. (While last post I considered this to be an experiment on its own, I now consider it a result of the WoW experiment.)
Austerity Britain #8
Stuart Crawford IRE (Larne Co Antrim)
So will you pray that He will finish the work and that, when it’s over, I will have an undivided heart.
88. During holiday season, take a drive and view the lights
Triglycerides: 192
Everyday I am surrounded by amazing women who astound me with their power and unnerving strength and not just through their poses. Every one of us has a story, a battle and a purpose. I am reminded in every class what we face as individuals. Yet I give thanks to these women allowing me to be apart of their lives, their challenges and their triumphs.
Online retialer of the year
Ø Submit your kit design work for publication when applicable to open calls. Where possible, credit must always be given for projects created using our kits.
Just to talk to you
He was mesmerized by the game, and sat still for 20 minutes (and I mean STILL just watching), then he went over and dazzled all of Ava's teammates for a little while! It was just so cute.
Then Libriumia gets sick. Fever, stomach cramps, diarrhea, vomiting. When she is not feeding the baby, she’s expressing milk with a hand pump. When she is not doing that her body is pumping out other things. I give the baby lots of formula, through the night, to let my wife sleep. I struggle to the shops, in the coldest April on record. My fever hasn’t completely gone.
At the rate the poachers are killing rhinos, we will soon have no rhinos left. Please drop by the Kariega web site and learn about their fight against poachers.
Print some of these out and grab your pencil to see what you come up with. Please be so kind as to share you musings with the rest of us. I will share some of mine shortly. Remember that the way to learn quilting designs is with pencil and paper so doodle to your heart's content!
About Turkish Airlines
I've had this card in the making for some months. I just couldn't get it finished. Today I was determined that it had to be done. The seam binding is hand dyed and the doily stamp has been embossed with ink sponged over the top. I cut the top layer of the butterfly out of the same embossed piece of card stock. The dsp is Beau Chateau. A pearl flourish and a sentiment finished it off. I hope it looks ok, I'm still not too sure about it.
Mr Mojo is back in da house....
to all the despondency
:: Creating a healthy self-image.
What do Scarlett O’Hara, Michael Corleone, the Vicomte de Valmont have in common? They all have power. Scarlett is so beautiful and charming no man can resist her. She also has the power to overcome the hardships that come her way during the war.
A: The winner will be determined by the outcome of five states: Michigan, North Carolina, Ohio, Pennsylvania, Wisconsin
The Allies, however, are played by bigger stars,
Meats: In order to have this body, you must consume meat. I’m not willing to help anyone who subscribes to a vegan lifestyle. I have nothing against it (other than loads of scientific evidence) but I don’t have any advice for people who cannot or will not eat meat. A variety of protein sources are very necessary when you engage in physical activity. It is mandatory to have healthy portions of meat to encourage muscle growth and healing time. When you are at the supermarket look for these types of meats in particular to add to your diet: Lean ground meat (12% or less), lean ground turkey, sliced turkey, skinless chicken breast, cube steak, any lean cuts of beef, all fish and seafood, including canned tuna. Meats you should avoid are hot-dogs, sausage, fatty ground meats, links, breakfast meats, cured-meats (which are high in sodium), salamis and deli-style meats (too much sodium). Feel free in being creative in your meat preparation, but keep these suggestions in mind. Use olive-oil in your cooking instead of butter or cooking oil. Do not roll your meat in flour. Add plenty of fresh herbs, spices and veggies to flavor your meat. Marinades are fine. Baking, and grilling are the best way to cook your meat. In general, the best portion size for meats are 4-6oz for females and 6-8oz for males, but this depends on your specific goal which we will discuss in a later blog.
And not a day later, here I am. Posting this entry. Making a public declaration that I’m going to fight the Resistance that Pressfield talked so much about. I still may not have gotten everything out of his book that he intended to give, but I did get something; a realization that great things may not always comes to those that work for them, but it sure as hell increases their chances.
The mini-book I'm giving you a link to is dedicated to "Susan" and her family. It was illustrated by my son (GoodGraphicsDan - Youtube!) and husband. We had fun working on it together. Sharing time with family is important to me and to "Susan", too! You may not be able to use this book in your classroom...for obvious reasons! Perhaps you can use it with your own family! The Way of the Cross - a book for Holy Week...The Way of the Cross
And the white rose is a dove.
“Can we get cupcakes?”
Imboden noted that many LDCs justify clamouring for membership on the grounds that it will open up new markets, a motive he argued is “flawed”, since LDCs already have good trade relations with most countries.
if you are a creator, maker, hip shaker
I really hate the title. My guess is you are going for a juxtaposition of what the nursery rhyme evokes and the strength of Lizzy (little girls aren't made of sugar and spice; they're made of oak etc.) Coming at the end of the query it doesn't do that. We haven't really seen what Lizzy is made of; we've seen the weakness of Mike Joseph. Since the novel is about pedophilia and prostitution the title has to avoid an "ickiness" risk that other books don't. Obviously, an agent does not stop reading a book based on a bad title, but you want to be very aware of the effect every word in your query, including the title, conveys.
(Emphasis added. Internal citations omitted.)
A ‘tweak’ of his name’s second syllable, and voilá! Bâri′ and Barry become “Barack”.
I’m sure, like me, most of my followers have been in a long-term relationship with their makeup too. Don’t you think it’s time we take our relationship to the next level? Time we get down on one knee and pull out that ring? I saw a groupon that will let you make that commitment this past weekend.
She said that the prime minister would use DC ‘in the main’, adding: ‘Occasionally he would sign them off LOL, lots of love. Actually, until I told him it meant laugh out loud and then he did not sign them like that any more. But, in the main, DC, I would have thought.’
9) The UN Genocide Law, SPECIFICALLY recognizes the existence of RACE as an ‘Identifiable Group’, to prevent what anti-Whites like you are doing right now.
Level 8: MP Cost: 12, Attacks up to 4 enemies, Damage: 109%, Attacks the enemies 4 times.
I'm all done except for the clear wax. I don't think they can mail it out fast enough. I can hardly handle the excitement! Try to be patient all you nail biters out there :)
I'm also really excited because my office is throwing me a small baby-shower/party-type thingy on Friday (my last day). I've been blessed with awesome co-workers, and it feels nice to to be thought of by them before I leave. I am keeping my fingers crossed that there will be projects for me to work on at my current office so that I can return next year.
Why didn’t the government let people who wanted to go away to live free go, if that’s what they wanted? If they wanted to leave Romania to live elsewhere, why shoot them or torture them instead of letting them leave to the Free West – especially since officials shouted how bad the western world is?
The purpose of the game it to help middle school students understand themselves better through objects around them through investigating object-based mysteries as well as engaging in open investigations where they record their own research findings. The game is designed to teach the skills it takes to be a history detective, namely the ability to see, act, and think like one. Students beef up their capacity to make observations and inferences, to find and evaluate historical evidence, and to draw conclusions based on that evidence.
11:00am-11:25am- BOOKED by Kim
The books on offer are as follows:
Obviously this wasn't a free project but I think it is so worth the cost! He got so many new legos for his birthday from everyone else that I think he definitely is glad we made him a table to make all those new legos even more fun!
no longer feels so significant!
I knew her choice as soon as I read the note aloud. 6 times she has been allowed fancy dress, 5 times she has worn the princess dress and on 1 occasion I persuaded her to go as a pirate.
One thing she stressed that she feels is very important in fostering is to find a Christian foster agency in the area. She loves her Christian organization in Houston that they work with, but I wouldn’t be able to use them. She said just to google “Christian foster agencies in DFW”.
all, who have seen their dedication and competence
How impossibly cute?
Our first stop was Gymboree, where bathing suits were on sale for $9.99. The girls fit into size 4T bathing suits now. (Although, when Allie tried hers on at home, the sides up top were big. I may return it.) I also found 1 pair of shorts on clearance in size 4T. There were hardly any 4T items left in the store. We then checked out a "Mommy and Daddy" store. 7 For All Mankind. The last pair of jeans I purchased was for $10 from the clearance rack located at the back of the Gap outlet store. They were too long so I chopped the bottoms off and they have now frayed into semi-floods. I managed to find a pair of new jeans for $50 and they were the softest, most comfortable pair of jeans I have ever tried on so I bought them. Unfortunately, I am not 6 feet tall so I need to remove 8 inches or so from the bottom.
I offered Roswell my arm to stand off, but he decided to decline and flew off.
What people used to do was they used to hold water in their hands and let the water leak out of the hand slowly, and for that much time they used to do sun gazing. You look at the sun, gaze and allow the water to seep down. So you need to know timings – It will take a couple of minutes, maybe two or three minutes for the water to leak out. Till that time, you gaze at the sun and let the water leak out and you will see that your body gets energized. That was the technique behind it. Not just giving water to the sun like that, it will not work.
But it didn’t run far. After a short distance the bear stumbled and fell. The single arrow Ron Sr. shot severed a blood vessel in the bear’s heart. He stumbled and died, but not until he had done damage to Ron Jr.
Thus the good people of Petersfield Hampshire will have to attend a course called Safety With Ladders, which covers the Health and Safety Executive Work at Height Regulations 2005.
The story starts out innocently enough, evoking childhood memories of trick or treating in the autumn moonlight, and slowly developes into something much more sinister and dark.
Despite not studying my speech, I wasn’t nervous. Until . . .
13. Athletic Shorts: Chris Crutcher
The first-rate introduction of the Dream Lord in this episode overshadows the lameness of the old people monsters. Toby Jones relishes his role as the Doctor’s dark side, and takes obvious joy in taunting our hero with lines like, “I’m surprised you haven’t got a little purple space dog, just to ram home what an intergalactic wag you are!” The story had us wondering along with the characters as to which was the genuine reality, and wondering if the Dream Lord was some incarnation of the dreaded Valyard. We definitely want to see more of Toby in Season Six. Amy’s Choice is easily among the funniest episodes of the new season, thanks in part to Rory’s hair.
I have been riddled with insecurity my entire life. As my husband and I have been discussing this very subject over the past few weeks, I have gone so far as to say..."I cannot remember a time that I did feel secure." So, for a book to be written by another Christian sister, and it being placed in my hands at a time that I was feeling very insecure....I totally call it a "God Thing." Then, to read and begin applying the scripture that was in the book and to feel, for the first time in almost 46 years of life, chains breaking that have had a firm grasp...yes, I love the book! To me, it does not matter who wrote it. It could have been Jane Smith (just a random name I chose) from Nebraska (sounds like a nice homey state, right?)that I had never heard of and I would have read this and if it lined up with scripture and moved me....I'd be singing the praises of the aforementioned Jane Smith. It just so happens that the book I chose was not written by a Jane Smith from Nebraska...she was a little more well known. So what?
Let me tell you words cannot describe how excited I was to learn I was going to be teaching about our new mini-album - the Mix & Mingle Album at Close to my Heart's annual Convention! I had so much fun coming up with some 'unique' and 'creative' ways to use this the very versatile product!
If you’ve been reading, you know the answer.
I don't know what got us hooked on this show, but we love it. Funny with some drama and romance thrown in, there's something for everyone. My favorite characters are Hardison and Parker, Elliot coming in at a close third. You can find this group of grifters and theives on TNT.
Here’s to the hurricane that threw us both to different skies,
And because of this special day,we ( just the Team ) have something very special for Emma and all of you! :) :)
We are having a big party at our house today for our friend Sergio from Brazil! He has been here since June, and is finished with his research so he is now going back home next week.
Oh Blogger, I won't be sad to say goodbye to you in a few weeks, when my new blog launches. Last night, Blogger was having some issue and would not even let me post, and I wasn't the only one! Boo.
Beloved has been paid today and I will be paid tomorrow. All our money is already divided up and organised, ready to pay the mortgage and bills, as well as putting money aside for food and petrol and a few other things we need to pay for this month. Once this is all done, there really wont be much left, but thats ok, at least everything will be paid for. I'm gearing up to do my annual review of the debt management plan and I need to look at my budget and find ways to increase my payment.
All these questions and thoughts are not simple!
I was reminiscing and thinking back to my good ol' days and trying to remember what songs defined my generation. Since the list was long, I thought of a song that had that "damn the man!" attitude, so I settled on the New Radicals' You Get What You Give. They were probably a one-hit wonder because I can't think of anything else they sang. Oh well.
I put a second coat on the top because it was already dry by the time I did the rest, and I let it dry overnight (well, more like 2 days). I was actually dreading tackling the drawers because they have so much carving/detail on them that I thought they would be really difficult. They were, but it wasn’t too bad. I also felt like it would take a long time to do all 9 drawers. I decided that I wouldn’t paint the inside, and eventually just line the bottoms with pretty paper or fabric (that will be done in the future). A few days later I did a 2nd coat on the entire dresser, and it looked great! There was still a tiny bit of wood coming through on the left and right sides of the dresser, so I did one more coat on those, and then another coat on the top. Lastly I did all the drawers, and those definitely took the longest. I ended up putting 2-3 coats on depending on how it was looking. I had a hard time with some of the spots with the wood filler (from the hardware holes), and ended up having to sand it down a lot more over those areas, and then repaint…it was a process.
He believes it.
As we sink deeper into debt with the rest of the world, more of our productive assets such as dairy farms will be sold. Ironically, in seeking to own the expensive roofs over our heads we increase the risk of becoming tenants in our own country.
Roger Gritts was raised in a troubled home in Harrogate. Both of his parents struggled with heroin addiction and struggled even harder to raise their seven accidental children. Being the youngest of the offspring, he frequently bore the brunt of his parent’s frustrations.
Wilsonia to Nqaza;
During the Holiday's I did a review for GourmetGiftBaskets.com's Classic Christmas Basket. Which included some really great and absolutely delicious goodies. Little did I know that they also offer baked goods. Such as Cheesecake, Red Velvet Cake, Cookies, Whoopie Pies and Brownies! Yum! I was lucky enough to get to try one of each flavor of GourmetGiftBaskets.com's Brownies. They have 6 different brownie varieties and they are so good. All were rich, and super moist. All individually wrapped to preserve freshness. My absolute favorite was the Cheesecake Brownie which was a brownie topped with a generous layer of delicious cheesecake. Ah-may-zing! I'd also like to mention that some of them were edge pieces which is great because the edge brownie pieces are my favorite. I've never seen a company do that before and you really get a more homemade feel. I didn't eat them all to myself, I had 3 helpers and nobody had anything bad to say. These would make a great gift.
Fireworks: Launch Blue Fireworks
We have survived 4 moves, an evil mother-in-law, Cancer, joblessness and complete financial ruin- but we are still together.
I have a Boppy, but from everything I've heard and read the My Breast Friend might be the better option for positioning while breastfeeding. However, who wants to carry around a pillow called "My Breast Friend"? "Honey, hand me the Boppy!" sounds much better in my book. We took the Boppy to the hospital at the advice of the person who gave us the Boppy, and I'm so glad we did. Even Chris loves using it to hold her.
So I took myself out to the beach - with my digital camera, of course. (Thankfully, that still worked!) There have been storms coming through San Diego, and the tides have been high and the waves have been enormous!For these gulls, the world hasn't changed much since my parents time. The ocean still crashes against the rocks, and food is the issue of the day. The air currents still lift outstretched wings. It was the reminder that I needed. It reminded me of one of my favorite poems - "Wild Geese" by Mary Oliver, who wrote "Whoever you are, no matter how lonely, the world offers itself to your imagination."
Tuesday night I also got some underwhelming photos of northern lights.
And he was hit by a credit card scandal in 2008 when one of his deputies, Ian Clement, received a suspended jail sentence for abusing his City Hall corporate credit card. Mr Clement admitted using it to buy lunches for himself and his lover. A judge said Mr Clement had ‘flagrantly and arrogantly’ misused public money. He was forced to quit his £127,000-a-year post.
The noise stopped. Xu Guan heard muffled voices as he pushed the sliding window the rest of the way open. The view to the ground brought another round of nausea. Xu Guan dry-heaved as he lifted one leg over the sill of the window.
Hands briefly grasping the copper still column to check the heat of the evaporated distillate, fingers darting in and out of the stream of clear distillate emerging from a small tube aimed at a collection vessel, tasting, testing, tasting again, suggesting modest changes in the process that would bring out the nuttiness and inherent sweetness and heat of the malted barley used to make the mash.
Another will be with you in your season of confusion,
Traditionally a French baguette is used to top the soup, but I'm far from traditional and hence the ciabatta :)
Palpatine: You're not in a position to be judging my jokes, boy. shoots him with lightning again If you won't join me in not buying the cookies from the Girl Scouts, then, young Skywalker, you will die. more lightning and cackles
Of course, you can't forget the documentary photographer of the time, Dorothea Lange! She photographed migrants, many who had come from Oklahoma, and used those photographs to show how badly these people needed help.
We are back after a splendid week in Lanzarote where the sun shone and the beer and wine flowed and the entire visit was made even more memorable by meeting up with fellow-blogger Little Nell and her husband. Us bloggers inhabit a strange world where we know each other well but, in most cases, have never actually met face-to-face. And can there be a finer tribute to this on-line community that we belong to than the fact that a fellow blogger can extend such a warm hand of friendship and hospitality to someone who has, until then, been little more than a pixel avitar. Marilyn (Little Nell) and her husband John took us around the island and introduced us to places that will live in the memory for a long time. For the next few days I will feature some of the photographs I took in order give people just a little flavour of what is a stunning island set in the Atlantic Ocean about 80 miles off the African coast.
Saturday Night Live on 4/21/12 replayed the show with Daniel Radcliffe. They had one hilarious sketch after another but the one that hit a bit too close to home was called, “You can do anything”.
Friends whose hands ranged from small to large tried these on, and the mitts fit them all quite well. The pattern provides instructions for one size knit in fingering weight yarn; it comfortably fits hand circumferences of 6 to 7.5 inches. You could tweak the fit by going down or up a needle size, using light fingering weight yarn, or using sportweight yarn.
Day 1: September 3, 2011
The Ancient One is similarly puzzled when our citizens and some political leaders insist that it is our destiny to impose their definition of democracy on other countries and cultures. It seems to me that the heart of America's own fight for independence was to reject having someone else's system of governing imposed on us. Our earliest settlers escaped persecution and came to a land where they could live their lives within their own belief systems. In a line in the play You Can't Take It With You, Grandpa tells his granddaughter, "who says that they're right and we're wrong." I might add that the reverse is equally true, "Who says that we're right and they're wrong."
An Australian immigrant writing on janglo@yahoogroups.com (Jerusalem Anglo — the virtual billboard that connects many English-speaking olim) cries from the heart:
If veggies could oblige me more by being delicious, I am sure I would eat more of them!
Sam Adams Boston Lager - crisp and clean, lots of flavor for a "mainstream" beer.
2000- The key to remember here is that this was a major market top and the beginning of the secular bear market that has lasted to this day. The S&P 500 hit its bull market peak of 1553 in March 2000 while the Nasdaq was in the process of topping out above 5000. It then had a sharp fall into April. Note that the market meandered sideways to higher until September, making a lower high at 1530, then turning down into the end of the year. Key turning point in March/April. Transition to secular and cyclical bear market. No net progress for 6 months from March high.
it's just not there.
Last update: 5/16/12 at 11:23 AM
In my head it will feel like an eternity.
And you thought that we are
To gie them music was his charge;
The barge carrying the massive metal box, painted in morbid white, arrived at the source of the oil spill about 65km (410 miles) off the Louisiana coast earlier today. The oil giant intends to lower the metal box some 1.5km below the sea surface, place it on the ruptured wellhead and then pump the oil out through a pipe placed on top of the box. Will it work? BP says they have never tried it at that depth!
Further, having been absent for over a season through injury, Wilshere has a duty of care to his employers that demands he think very long and hard about what is good for his long-term career. Is being carried on a wave of jingoism really that important? Does he really care what the readers letters in The Daily Mail say? Or would he be better to declare himself unavailable for the tournament? Personally I believe he must remain at the club for his return to fitness to be properly monitored.
The problem, really, is attitude.
Miep writes in her memoirs, "I stand at the end of the long long line of good Dutch people who did what I did and more - much more- during those dark and terrible times years ago, but always like yesterday in the heart of those of us who bear witness."
Sure, they made a butt load of money from merchandise and box office sales, but outside the financial arena, they have no similarities aside from both series jump starting Robert Pattinson’s career. I won’t mention the uses of characterization, mythology, or narrative skill in either of these stories, because this rant would be several pages longer. So, I’ll explain the illegitimacy of the great debate in 3 key components: demographic, scope, and stakes (and no, not the ones Buffy uses.)
It’s feast or famine around here with pictures. I’ve barely taken any the last couple weeks and I’ve taken a ton this week. I’m splitting this post up because of too many pictures.
The last film I'm talking about was my favorite. It was an in-depth documentary about Huey P. Newton and the Black Panther Party. It features some key landmarks in the development of the party and struggle to preserve it. For example, the bullet-ridden residence of Huey P. Newton and the house where Little Bobby Hutton died. It was a brief history on something I didn't know was "just around the corner"
U: Understanding: I try to look at all situations from all points of views not just my own!
exaggerate!’
Bake for 15 minutes or until cheese is melted. Top each scoop with a little of the shredded cheese and bake for another 5 minutes, or until shredded cheese is melted.
There is no one-on-one combat as such between the principal heroes and the principal villain in THIEF, as usually takes place in related adventure-films. Earlier sequences show Jaffar triumphing over the heroes with his magic with no real contest, but when Ahmad and Abu join in flouting his forces with the help of a flying carpet, Jaffar seems to run out of magic and flees, only to receive the same fate most villains get even when they do engage in combat.
Playing actor Riteish Deshmukh’s pet with a high sex drive in the film ,the pug ,the makers confirm was a star in its own right -Says director Sachin Yardi “There are 2 pugs that have character roles in the film. One of them belongs to an eccentric billionaire played by Anupam Kher who believes the pug is a reincarnation of his mother and the other belongs to Riteish who carries him around everywhere he goes, strapped to a baby sack”. Adds hilariously, “Riteish uses his pet to make money by getting him to mate with other pugs.
my ugly-ass beloved symbol of home
On Thursday I got into a car accident. It was one of the scariest experiences of my life. But fortunately no one was severely injured. Although there were stitches and an ambulance (not for me). The police and 10 witnesses confirmed to me that it was not my fault. My husband is excellent at coming to my rescue quickly (as well as one of my co-workers). And apparently my reaction to traumatic events is to spray cry hysterically.
he jerks his chin skyward,
For the back I made a pouch and a tag to slide up to retrieve the candy. First I cut a piece of CS 3 1/4" x 5" for the pouch and for the tag I cut a piece of CS 2 1/4" x 5 1/4" --- Below is the sketch on how to do the back. When you are done with the pouch, place the candies in the treat cup and insert the tag to cover the hole.
Since 1970 the budget for black education was raised by about 30% per year every year. More than any other government department.
There is no food and little water to be had, but after three hours (I think, I was kind of loopy by then) we take off. This was world’s slowest flight. I felt like I could have run alongside faster, Fred Flintstone style. We land in Kansas City, Kansas or Missouri, I don’t know – whichever has an airport – to refuel. A woman got sick everywhere and we had to pull up to a gate to get her off the flight. Finally, we’re airborn again and it took forever to get to Los Angeles. And mind you we had no food, no water, disgustingly foul bathrooms, and a short-tempered flight crew, which didn’t make that trip pleasant. I was never so happy to land at almost 3:00 AM, only nine hours after I was supposed to arrive.
The team has been utterly dominant as it has only lost six sets all year and never more than one set in a match. It’s been awe-inspiring.
With these points I shall begin to offer some advice on why doing drugs is BAD (in my opinion)
We also had some Montessori math items on our shelves this week.
Network
But, my mother (who I was so very hard on just a few weeks ago…) pointed out that, if I include the original weight loss on top of this weight loss, I’ve lost much closer to 50 lbs. In fact, I have lost a *grand total* of 45.8 lbs. That’s exciting.
Your parents should take delight in the fact that some other people are helping them pay the tuition fees so that they can keep their retirement funds largely intact.
11. No Air
and we might share those vaults of silver
i told him he didn't talk to me for 5 days.
In other news, Hwart's Bitter (MB0029) is going to be transferred to secondary later this week. It's been fermenting for just over a week and smells pretty decent. Even with all the issues on brew day, I'm interested to see how it ends up.
Between 1995 and 1996, he held the post of deputy chief economist at the U.S. Department of Labor.
Coarse salt and ground pepper
I am definitely going to appreciate these casseroles in a few weeks!
DRYH plays even better than it reads.
2cd in Walks: 499
Since reading that, I've been experimenting a little with this kind of body visualization, focusing on my stomach / digestive area and imagining the resources of my body - blood, peptides, molecules, energy, whatever - all going to that one spot. The book describes the entire body and everything working within it as an "information network" so that I can imagine my stomach as an area that needs more research, since I usually find myself out of touch with it. Often I will find myself in the bizarre situation of knowing that I should be hungry (as a healthy person who last ate several hours ago) but not actually being able to feel that hunger. It's like my stomach is not accessible to me. I will get headaches or feelings of fatigue that alert me to my hunger without ever having passed through the stage where I felt it in my stomach.
First I got Jack, but that was at another house, so I can't complain. He was a stray, but he's a darling, and I am so very happy he chose me, because I certainly didn't choose him. I didn't want another cat when he found me.
Q. What if the Higgs does not exist?
And instead of using some tiny bit of will power and just having something light, I ended up sharing these plates of little "flautas" , dipping them into a bucket of delicious guacamole and washing them down with Margaritas.
Don’t Think Twice It’s Alright – Hub Hollow
ECB: Extra Bucks, formerly called Extra Care Bucks. CVS’ version of catalinas for a dollar amount off your next transaction. Prints at the bottom of your receipt instead of from a separate machine. Can only be used at CVS.
NAB booth #SU10012
When the panel was over, actress Jane Curtin did a bang-up job of reading a passage from A Wrinkle. Following Ms. Curtin, a group of teenagers performed a dramatic reading of yet another section of the book.
'Is there anything different you've done the Pedigree today Ed?'
Social directors from Aventura to West Palm Beach met to discuss ways of encouraging the public to use the country clubs as venues for their weddings, anniversary parties, quinces and other milestone events and parties.
I believe Grace is where a lot of us live. However with hard work and honest intentions we still make our deadlines and finish lines...we even get out of the old year and into the new one...
Have you heard this story before? It's been one of my favorite lullaby's since we sang it in choir when I was in high school, yes I was a choir geek. Surprised? President of the club in my senior year, actually. Hehe... yeah...
dreams could be held through TV
I will try and update one more time before we leave!
2 moved
Oh, to be sure, I had some clues this was going to happen. I was disappointed when he chose the steps of Lincoln Memorial for the site of his rally; for he chooses to honor the man who, more than any other, began the process of destroying our Constitutional government. Then, when I heard that one of his featured speakers was going to be Sarah Palin, I knew that the message I had hoped to hear from him was going to be, at best, corrupted. I certainly am not alone in this assessment. Ron Paul argued essentially the same thing in the Foreign Policy website only yesterday. (Other concurring voices have arisen. See the updates at the end of this post.)
He has open arms
I emailed her to see if she was happy with it (she is!), and an email conversation followed that I'm imagining drove Amanda to the brink of insanity. Next thing I know, she's taken all the information I'd been rambling on about, and turned them into gorgeous design boards! I'm in love with all of them, so once again, my indecisiveness is crippling me. Cue you guys...the clever readers!
"This," he held up the permission form, "And the kids. You bring. We take care of rest."
Our (kind, generous) hosts, professors of media, were surprised to learn we don’t have (aside from CSPAN, I suppose–I tried to explain that!!) an official, state media. Surprised at how deep the newspaper crisis is, as China’s print readership (like India’s) is still growing, with new readers rising in waves of rising income, education & literacy.
Capaldi’s Ford and Bailey’s Mazda battled for the second position for most of the race, joined early on by the No. 45 Honda Fit of Sage Marie. Bailey finished second with Capaldi taking the third spot at the checkered flag.
Viewers should be excited to note that much of Walken’s performance in the 4:53 short film draws on his landmark work in The Deer Hunter, and the ageing actor (despite the late career change) has lost none of his artistic flair or humanity. The erratic, confused analysis might seem loose or vague to financial careerists. But as with the Oscar performance of 1978, WalkenTalken treats the viewer to a brilliant portrayal of a broken man, returning home from harrowing experiences, trying to organise his thoughts, his life, and move on. It is WalkenTalken’s refusal to let go, and abandon trauma, that we (the viewers) know will eventually be his undoing.
1346 D-IV/22/2000. “Justice Clarence Thomas and the ‘Original Understanding’ of the Constitution.” Law Panels, Annual Convention, American Culture Association, New Orleans, Louisiana.
So at the same time that I am working on the next novel in the series (and by the way, that is going really well), I am struggling a little bit with this fear that has taken up residence in my stomach. I am telling myself that it is absolutely amazing that I even have this opportunity. I am reminding myself that this is a dream come true and that, ultimately, what matters is that my story will be out there. I am repeating the phrase, “You can’t please all the people all the time.”
(President/C. EO/Commissioner) was heading up a charity group
Serve it chilled. A bowlful of this smoothie for breakfast is so refreshing and healthy.
I can't remember where I saw this idea but I liked it. If it was your idea please comment so I can give credit where credit is due.
HI! And a happy Monday to you! This weekend was my sweet daughter's birthday, and my sweet Daughter-In-Laws birthday too! I'm so blessed to have a great DIL! She's a great mom to my grandkids:-) .WOW time flies! My daughter turned 30...I can't believe I have a 30 year old!! She was taking it hard but I think she realized we can't stop it....so enjoy lol! She has turned into the most beautiful, sweet, caring adult and her laugh is contagious. She always has a smile on her face for all. I'm so so proud of the person she is :-) I saw the grand kids this weekend and as always they are the cutest!!! Jasmine drew me a Mickey mouse picture..because she know grandma LOVES Mickey! And Liberty and I read a book. It rained here all weekend...I mean poured! But, we needed it so bad...Were far behind this year. I hope you have a great week!
"Seriously Kate what is your problem today?"
Does a 30 month sentence for being guilty of four felony counts of Obstruction of Justice and Perjury seem excessive to you?
Unfortunately college basketball is over and football is over 4 months away from starting. But opening day for major league baseball was sunday night. The Chicago Cubs opened on Monday. And they opened with a bang. The Cubs opened with a 16-5 loss, but it is ok because according to Cubs fans this is their year. So here is my top ten things said by a Cubs fan prior to opening day.
Yet at this moment it is seeming to lift again. I feel like I can breathe and feel some light at the end of this thing. Maybe it is in my head but the last few days I have felt much stronger than I have in a long time. This is so good and what I longed for and prayed for but now that it is becoming reality I am unsure.
As you gain levels, you choose different items to use. You’ll decide what stat to focus on. At level 10 you specialize into one of three talent trees (there are three unique trees for each class), giving you even more flexibility. Within each talent tree, you’ll make decisions on which talents to learn. And later on, you’ll be able to switch between two different talent trees.
From early 1970s to late 1980s, Globo dominated both the audience and the development of television programming. It had a 60-80% share in major cities at any given time. As television researcher Joseph Straubhaar declared, “even people who might have had questions about the news almost always accepted the Globo novelas”. During this period, Globo was accused of being the mouthpiece of the dictatorship, mainly because of its omission in covering the Diretas Já movement, in which thousands of Brazilians gathered on public squares to demand a direct election for President. In 1980, Tupi went bankrupt and was closed by the military government. Its signal was split and given to Silvio Santos, who launched SBT, and Adolpho Bloch, who launched Rede Manchete. Since Tupi’s disappearance, Globo virtually dominated the market alone. The only time its leadership was threatened was when Manchete aired Pantanal in 1990. Nevertheless, Manchete never achieved the same success with any other of its telenovelas, and would have the same fate of Tupi, ceasing its operations on May 1999, and having its signal replaced by that of RedeTV!.
Up and down 1st Saddle. Kind of a test outing. I could feel the shin a bit hiking, but it definitely didn't make it worse. Rather, like usual, a little activity seemed to actually make it feel a bit better.
Our entire family is loving it. I just wonder where I have been these past few years
Well, I can tell you that one thing:if you ever decide to go there you will not regret it. It was worth the 3 hours car trip and even the hospital incident.i have fall in love in the incredible vibe, charm and almost dolly house look.
You stand for it even when it causes you grief
My creative life has been under seige by a mountain of not-so-creative activities - house cleaning, upheaving the entire upstairs for new carpet (see photo below- who knew new carpet would be so disruptive or so much messier than I thought), finishing wedding invitations (less creative than you might imagine), and of course work.
Saturday morning Chrysty came back over and we spent several hours in my craft room creating and chatting and having just THE BEST time! Here's some of the cards we made ...
Kate Henderson, Bildwechsel Glasgow, B/1 35 Carnarvon Street, Glasgow G3 6HP, along with your contact details.
I made this card below a while ago so thought I would share it this week and it is kind of a reminder that Mothers and Grandmothers are precious.
Shag looked thoughtful.
As Jude's mommy it is getting so hard to watch him face battle after battle. It just broke my heart yesterday to see him so weak and tired from whatever was bothering him. It is so hard to leave him each day. I just want to stay with him and cuddle him until he is well. I want so badly to have him in my arms anytime that I want to.
On May 7th, I’ll be interviewing Hunter Shea, author of Forest of Shadows and the forthcoming novel, Evil Eternal. Mark your calendars! The questions are fun, and there will be an excerpt from Evil Eternal.
Verse 11-12a: This is who you are because of Christ … _______________________________________
After measuring the aperture in the frame I printed the image slightly longer than the centre oval on sticky back canvas. I drew the cutting line by laying the shrink plastic frame over the picture and drawing around the inside edge. When cut out on this line the image was a perfect fit for the frame.
The most memorable laugh I got was... when I jumped up on stage and sang the chorus to Mustang Sally … because the lead singer of the band took a shine to me and said he’d take me to New York.
They like pork chops too.
The flower, stamped in VersaMark,
The design of the new Canadian War Museum used the theme “ordinary Canadians doing extraordinary things. This book contains vignettes of some of them from the heroic to the outrageous, but always getting the job done in the service of their country and the rest of us. Therefore, it is important that these—representative—deeds of courage and valour be remembered on behalf of those who have gone before.
The arrival of the Christmas fair season means that I need packaging. Lots of it. I use little buff envelopes and oval boxes on which I draw the little bird motif that seems to have become my logo. My Grandad used to draw a very similar bird on little notes he wrote to me.
The past is mine, and at this very moment, I am purchasing another
I also used lots of diffrent punches, and of course, ink distressed EVERYTHING!! It seriously felt so good to walk away from a project with my hands just filthy. LOVE it!!
Pirke Avot is mostly a collection of sayings from the rabbis of old. It it still widely studied because the sayings still have meaning and it is popular because it consists of many short, standalone aphorisms. We have several versions of the book in our library. Wisdom of the Jewish sages: a modern reading of Pirke avot, by Rabbi Rami M. Shapiro, is small enough to fit in your pocket and, even so, has more white space on each page than print. Rabbi Shapiro has translated and interpreted the ancient text in a way that is most meaningful to him and, he hopes, to other modern readers. He has removed some of the sexist language and, interestingly, translated Torah as Reality. It is worth reading in its own right, but even more interesting to compare to traditional translations and commentaries.
To be a bucket filler means you say kind things,
Wi' reaming swats (foaming ale), that drank divinely;
While salmon farmers have discounted Morton’s concerns saying that sea lice are also found in the wild, at the first sign of an outbreak, they add the pesticide emamectin benzoate to the feed. According to officials, the use of pesticides should pose no problem for consumers since Canadian rules demand that pesticide use be stopped 25 days before harvest to ensure all residues are flushed from the fish.
Night Of The... Hares.
The ruling elites would rather we remained ignorant of such matters, so there is little information out there apart from the British Crime Survey of 2004 which stated:
The earliest known collision between bird and aircraft came in 1908 (some sources say 1905), when flight pioneer Orville Wright collided with a bird over Dayton, Ohio; it died, while he survived. The first fatal crash came in 1912 when Cal Rodgers, first man to fly across the USA, hit a gull over Long Beach. His controls were jammed, and he hit the sea where he drowned, pinned upside down in the wreckage of his Wright Flyer.
I know discussing masturbation may be difficult for some but if anyone has any questions or concerns feel free to email me at theepottershand@hotmail.com .
Agency Building 1, Empire State Plaza
Shaw GM. Adverse human reproductive outcomes of electromagnetic fields: a brief smmary of the epidemiological literature. Bioelectromagnetics 2001; 5 (Suppl.5): S5-S18.
Being without the internet is a little like having your right arm cut off LOL, well that is a bit like how it has felt and combine that with a sick parent and the past 3 weeks all seem like a big blur.
Nobody ever received a tip. If nothing else had ever done so, this would have put the Dohnavur Family in a class by itself. Everybody heard that they would help even those who had no money at all. People knew they could count on "not being fleeced in private."
You can find many "how to board and batten" projects out there on the web. This is not one of them. I can, however, highlight some of the ways we went about it and some of the discussions we had while completing the project.
The alfar blood continued to circulate within the population, however, often accompanied by a strong, natural psychic potential. The crafts (seidhr training) were still taught within the settlement, especially among the descendents of the vanir, but it was often viewed with suspicion as “sorcery.”
One of the most comforting things in the life of children are loving grandparents. Some of us were given a tremendous blessing in childhood, that of having close access to living grandparents. All four of my grandparents were living until I was well into adulthood. They all four died within 6 years of each other.
Our 'Annual Yellowstone trip' turned into a weekend in Jackson instead.
Yet more ancient hearts than ours knew,
As we mouth out the words, “What the hell did we do wrong”
I will be respectful of others whether or not I agree with them.
that I've been lugging around...about 150 pounds.
On the third day he rose again
Dozing under the noonday sun,
2. The professional ‘bag carrier’Pop quiz: Which brand of bag will you most often find a Shanghai man carrying?a. Hello Kitty b. Dunhill The answer is, of course, Hello Kitty, because that’s his wife’s bag.When shopping with her Shanghainese boyfriend or husband (yes, Shanghai men shop, remember “ma” from point number one?) the Shanghai female doesn’t need to carry any bags, including her own petite purse. That’s a chore Shanghai men gladly take care of.Shanghainese men also often carry a packet of tissue with them in case their partner should need it.What’s more, they even remember their wife’s period cycle, to know when to behave with more tenderness.This might be considered “whipped” by outsiders, but a Shanghainese man will tell you proudly that it’s their pleasure.
Yet again, I repeat: there is a glint of hope.
Three months in, we’re still learning the quirks of our new home. The old Craftsman house is built over a slope that levels out into a deep back yard. Unlike any other place — every place, in fact — I’ve ever lived, there’s a crawlspace underneath. Towards the back of the house, right where the lot evens out, there’s so much clearance under the floorboards that, if I stoop just a bit, I can almost walk comfortably. This means we have decent storage for lawn equipment, surf boards, paint buckets, and like that.
As predicted, Not Back to School Camp has been educational for all of us! Chloe will be old enough to attend next year. MJ is looking forward to sharing it all with her.
In summary, this beer is good, buy it, and Aldi sell more like this. Cheers.
While he was whipping away I uncovered a small treasure. There in the leaf mold was a small plastic statuette of the Virgin Mary. She was on lying her back, arms outstretched waiting to be picked up. She is on her knees with her blue robes billowing behind her arms.
You don't know them. But you will (smiley face).
Granadilla produces gorgeous passionflowers and eventually a tangy tropical fruit. I look forward to a shady outdoor patio where I can escape the scalding sun, sip limonada, and listen to the buzzing cicadas' song.
As we got to the reality show part — “Live!” (as in “live on tv” and also as in “live! try to live!”), the special — Carolyn became very freaked out. She told me that she would have changed the channel. Then I told her, “I wouldn’t have let you!”
The Galeras volcano located south of Colombia’s Nariño department (state) erupted again Friday night (local time), prompting the local authorities to raise the alert level to red. Seismic activities were detected at the the volcano shortly after the volcano erupted, Colombia Reports said.
Irish Grand National winner Hear The Echo, Quito De La Roque, winner of last year’s John Smith’s Mildmay Novices’ Chase at Aintree and Jnwine Champion Chase at Down Royal and exciting novice chaser Last Instalment. O’Leary’s brother Eddie, a famous pinhooker based at Lynn Lodge Stud in Mullingar, oversees the Gigginstown racing operation while his young horses are brought along, often in point-to-points, at Pat Doyle’s County Tipperary stables. Davy Russell is retained rider and another major part of the team at Gigginstown (pronounced Jigginstown). While he has often courted controversy with his publicity for Ryanair, O’Leary wanted his horses to run in the now famous maroon and white colours of Gigginstown House Stud because he did not want to draw attention to his runners: “I do an awful lot of stuff for Ryanair, but that is PR – you’re trying to promote Ryanair and sell seats on planes. That’s all part of the job. Outside of that I don’t want – and don’t need – profile or publicity. This was the only vehicle I had of not having my name associated with it. Obviously, after you win a Gold Cup, everyone knows that Gigginstown House Stud is mine, but for a couple of years there nobody knew who or what the hell it was.”
And sweeping them, they disappeared.
timid than she looked, of great
So what “secrets” are driving you?
I'm not sure what kept us together, maybe it was a chance to over come the statistics of divorce, maybe it was the bind of the temple marriage, but I think it was because neither of us wanted to fail. We didn't want to hear anyone say "I told you so".
There may be various modes of thought that feed into such a view. One that I imagine is common goes something like this:
thumbs. All handlebars must extend outside the fork tubes at a
They say you'd let anybody fill your glass but no one your boots..
What you really need to do is follow Jesus – the One who breathes life into dead and dying hearts. He’s the One who will never let you down or lead you astray. And although following Jesus often goes directly against the feelings and direction that your heart says to go, His way is the right way, and the one way that you’ll never regret following.
Today is Day 4 of the JustRite May Release. Today there are 2 stamp sets to showcase - "Just Because" which is a set of 18 mini sentiments and "Because I Care" which is a set of 16 cling stamps. These 2 sets are perfect for everyday card making and they work very well together which is what I did with my card.
JSA would like to share a more traditional side of Japanese culture by creating this Matsuri on a smaller scale.
- Copy and paste the beads (element43), resize and dropshadow them.
The Cuban diplomatic mission in Washington explained in a letter to the Post, “We would like to clarify that the accused was not tried or convicted for any ‘humanitarian work’ associated with helping the Jewish community in Cuba gain Internet access, since synagogues in Cuba had connections long before his arrival.”
Other distinguished recipients of Australia’s only international prize for peace have included previous Nobel recipients Professor Muhammad Yunus, Archbishop Desmond Tutu, and Aboriginal leader Patrick Dodson.
Designed by the New York architect A. Page Brown in the Beaux Arts style in 1892, the ferry building was completed in 1898. At its opening, it was the largest project undertaken in the city up to that time. Brown designed the clock tower after the 12th-century Giralda bell tower in Seville, Spain, and the entire length of the building on both frontages is based on an arched arcade.
1. An English translation of the Samguk Sagi from Seoul National University
The 0.28mm Uni-ball Signo DX is not for everyone. It is a bit scratchy, and it is very fine, which may not be suitable for everyone's writing style. I recommend the 0.38mm over the 0.28mm, especially if you don't usually use fine-tipped pens. But if you're a micro-tip fanatic, then don't be afraid to give the 0.28mm a try. I do recommend the emerald green though; it is a great shade, especially if you want a slightly different green (or you're just obsessed with the colour green like I am) and it is also available in the 0.38mm and 0.5mm versions.
Here's the first one - I finally inked up one of my new Kraftin' Kimmies. They're so stinkin' cute! Only my colouring is not quite up my standards, unfortunately... Copics don't like the paper that I stamped on. I decided that it will have to do - I'm being lazy ;)
Already we see evidences of the coming Spring. Each dawn the sun rises a bit earlier, a little farther north along the eastern ridges. Each sunset falls a minute or two later on the western rim. The long shadows are slowly shrinking. Gradually the earth warms. Even today, in the very midst of heavy snow-squalls, a dozen or so Robins have gathered in the lower garden. They hop from patch to patch of melted ground, heads tilted, listening for earthworms. The unfrozen land still holds a great deal of stored solar energy, melting the snow from below. The Robins’ breasts are earth-colored, like the thawed places of raw clay, a rich contrast to the falling snow. Their bright chirping in the blue howling wind has warmth in it, telling us that winter’s tide is surely ebbing.
"gladly I will obey"
Now, it seems like I've got a few things to finish giving away...first up, Friday's giveaway, Books a' Flutter. Random.org chose:
Comments on the meal:
I can hear some of your discontent with today’s post “Seriously, this is gross, are you almost to the point?”. Yes, I am almost there.
so much so that the President had to acknowledge it.
1 regular
Have fun with your silhouettes we can't wait to see what you come up with.
We're excited to also announce that our Guest Designer from these three will be . . .
Though the period of a Nazirite vow was normally relatively short — 30 to 100 days, John the Baptist, like Samson, was a Nazirite from birth. Another perpetual Nazirite was the prophet, judge, and priest, Samuel, who was dedicated by his mother as referenced above. In the New Testament, the Apostle Paul may have taken a Nazirite vow (Acts 18:18) after his conversion. Also, in Acts 21, Paul was to pay the rather hefty expenses associated with the vow for some other Hebrew Christians in Jerusalem in order to demonstrate his respect for the Law of Moses.
It's not something that's in my personal history but that's probably because I'm in the UK where basements are not a standard feature of most houses, unless you are lucky enough to be able to afford a very old property indeed.
The rest of us were kept busy with Christmas preparations. Mom was in the kitchen night and day, cooking and baking. That left the cleaning up to the rest of us. The boys spent their time outdoors, cutting and stacking the wood. Dad spent every moment he could spare in the workshop.
And on the subject of imports and exports, right is the rather impressive cover for the German DVD release.
Puss in Boots
I took him a few times to various classes during my first year at UCSB not because I had some point to prove about young parents, but because I had no childcare and a number of my teachers made no exceptions about attendance.
Mexico’s lower house unanimously passed an anti-human-trafficking bill that establishes preventative and punitive measures and provides aid to victims of that crime.
Its sting will never go away.
What about you? Do you get the same excited anticipation you did in childhood? Where do you find your Christmas joy or has it gone missing from your life, too? Let me know in the comments.
Neddy was a great ass. He was full of energy and would run around the field, his bucket caught by the handle in his mouth. He was never fully broken-in despite Daddy using the best training equipment available. A neighbour broke their wrist trying to ride him, my brother sprained his and I had teeth marks on my upper arm for years, scarred from where he bit me.
Paradox itself is a paradoxical vessel that breaks into units when composed into a hymn
Andrew: show it to anyone did you
*Stir-fry the meat in small batches so it doesn't stew and set aside.
I can still remember the time when I started questioning why I go to church. I began to see things, and I know the Lord Jesus was talking to me. The Lord was speaking life into me when I was involved and sitting in a place that was only draining my spiritual life. The words, “Come out of her,” is all that was going through my mind and I didn’t know at the time what it referred to in the Scriptures. All I know is “Come out of her” was a message for me and to me that meant get out of that church. And I did. I have learned so much since then and my walk with Jesus is so much closer.
On the international economic front, the situation on euro area markets improved somewhat compared with the stress peaks experienced in the closing months of 2011. Here, the ECB’s conventional and non-conventional monetary policy measures contributed notably, as did the approval of the second bail-out programme for Greece following the restructuring of its debt in private hands and the progress in the ongoing reform of economic governance in the euro area. However, instability returned in the opening days of April, affecting Spain and Italy acutely owing to the doubts arising over the adjustment processes under way in both countries.
Am I really posting this?
Steve Etherington joined us for the night and we enjoyed a great meal and too much wine! Needless to say there was much swapping of “there I was” stories and looking at each other’s photos. What a fantastic day we’d all had with Guy flying 95km, Neil about 65k, Ken a 25km triangle getting up to 7,000′ in a cloud, and me a 65km scenic tour which included a 22km triangle at the beginning!
Gingrich: why not we’ve ruined this planet
Delete
“The kingdom of God is within man”
Captions for The New Yorker cartoon featured below are due on Wednesday before midnight.
I do not know and will never understand the emotional and psychological forces that lead someone to rape. I will never comprehend the hubris and helplessness that lead someone to abuse. And the notion of someone choosing to have sex with a child, regardless of what twisted pathways in their brains lead them to the act, is so far outside my framework of what is right and what is wrong that just thinking about it leaves me empty inside with an overriding sense that there is more evil in the world than I allow myself to think about.
Using technology to differentiate instruction
It was during a lonely, perhaps desperate, time in my life when I agreed to be set up on a blind date by my cousin. She wanted to set me up with her husband’s brother. How bad could it be? Verrrrry bad I was soon to find out!
Almost every day the media has a story about the environment: Global Warming; The Gulf Oil Spill; Contaminated Drinking Water…the list continues on and on. In an effort to learn more about ecology and to teach my children good habits, I embarked on a mission to find the 10 best children’s books on the subject. The following books are very entertaining and they all offer an excellent way to teach children (and adults) about the environment.
“Life is a broken jumble of failure, defeat, and unsettled-ness” (p. 35)
15 ovum
Ann Boyle, David 'D' Hershkovits, Robin Eubanks, Akbar Ali, Jim Grant, Eric Person, Melvin Gibbs, Reverend Bruce Johnson, Abel Domingues and Ronald Shannon Jackson.
Once again, I’ll make a vow – no more un-felt emotions…
Think about it this way. You have a boy who loves art. You don’t love art. You have no talent for art as far as you’re concerned. Being the best dad you can be, you learn to love art, you learn to be better at art. Being the best dad you can be for your kid, you encourage him to be the artist. You pursue what is best for them, not what you wish they would do.
"Once you get into this pattern, BB, it's extremely hard to get out of it," she said. "My concern is that as it takes hold it may exacerbate existing problems. That could lead to some pretty extensive mental illness and compromise your decisionmaking ability."
as promised, here some more "CRIMSON HARVEST", a story featuring The Batman I am putting together in my "spare" time.
We Write Poems wants us to consider humankind, this week. Visit to see what it’s about. Also, WWP is one of the sites offering a place to post your poems for the month.
to Times Square (a bad idea
My name is Charlene, I'm 28 years old and live in Central Scotland. I've been working in IT for 6 years, since about a year after graduating from university. At school my interests had been English and science and I had an interest in true crime so when I saw a poster outside my chemistry class when I was about 13 for a forensic science lab tech I thought it would be perfect. I didn't get the grades I needed to do Forensic Psychobiology so ended up doing IT instead because I figured everyone needs computers. Less than a year after I started uni CSI hit the screens and suddenly everyone wanted to do the course I'd wanted to do for 5 years. I've met at least 10 people since then who have done it. That made me a bit bitter for a while but none of them can get jobs in the field because too many people have done the course. I enjoyed my degree, got a 2:1 and after a year started working in IT. I enjoy my job well enough but I'm not passionate about it.
J. Job title: RDA- Registered Dental Assistant, Mommy and Wifey!
1/4 cup plus 2 tablespoons dried flaked unsweetened coconut, divided
In a mad world, only the mad are sane. - Akira Kurosawa
Life is luck, make it.
UNDERSTUDY: Well, he’s decided it is his little “project”.
Adweek: Why has advertising always been largely a white industry? There’s a lot of African-American artists who don’t think of advertising as something appropriate for them. Maybe it’s self-perpetuating. When you look at commercials and see a white world, you think, “That’s not my world.” But the way you can influence popular culture through advertising is so powerful that it’s a shame we don’t have a more diverse workforce. Gee, what a shame. It’s also shameful that no one sees the need to address the perpetrators of the self-perpetuating White world. So much easier to send Black candidates to Sweden.
it’s death herself
